Amazon is a great starting point
Oh come on. You're concluding after 4 years of the conservatives being in power that the liberals will never win a majority again? You're crazy. The leaders will change and people's values will change. Some governments will be more successful than others. 
Because they didn't catch him drinking water or pissing in the shower?
My librarian friend has an MLS. Could you elaborate on what types of career paths this would open up? (Cuz I'm interested.)
Topanga I wanna bang ya
Take this as a wake up call and do better things with your life. Just make sure they weren't able to get your credit card info or anything.
But why does the government want to pay what amounts to about 20% of the federal deficit for a plane that is only of use in an offensive war? Should Canada participate in America's permanent worldwide war? 
Sometimes it just happens. Maybe you're having some fluctuations in your testosterone or estrogen. I also usually break out the week before my period starts, which is super annoying having to deal with PMS and zits. Yuck. Maybe it's the changing weather? Humidity? Bad voodoo presences in your vicinity? Maybe your skin wants to have one last laugh before you never ever have acne ever again? That would be awesome...  It's so hard to know for sure. But it won't last forever, and soon enough you'll forget it even happened.
How come the number of dead and wounded increases every time I check?
UFC is as close to a sport as I watch. I hate sports unless I am playing/interacting with friends, other than that I don't care. But watching a human overcome another in the most basic form of unaltered competition I like, lol that is how my cousin explains it.. But I have seen maybe two live fights, at the houses of others, and watched cool moments on YouTube, the majority of figts I have seen are ones that my cousin gave me, gigs and gigs worth. Although I don't understand many of the areas of the sport, i have an immensive appreciation for those who can go up against the best in the world, keep their cool, and overcome extreme pain, fatique, and fear while demonstrating amazing skill. He'll I guess I like it more than I thought. Then again my line of work has put me in some shitty situations and watching a fight I can recreate some of that adrenaline and suspense that danger brings. /Puts on sunglasses. It's not a cool job, don't ask lol. 
Really? Can you honestly get a shrink to say that "there is a 50% chance of this outcome" and back it up? Because quantum mechanics does that every day of the week and Sundays.
Atheists are stupid animals.
"All set themselves up as courageous underdogs fighting a corrupt elite engaged in a conspiracy to suppress the truth or foist a malicious lie on ordinary people. This conspiracy is usually claimed to be promoting a sinister agenda: the nanny state, takeover of the world economy, government power over individuals, financial gain, atheism."  Saying that B.S. is B.S. is not living in denial. Neither is it being a conspiracy theorist.  BTW, this article is B.S. too.
&gt;her work.  what work? She just stands around being cute. 
It connects to china
Garmin
This whole hill of beans is sooo messed up !!!.  Pictures from the demonstration at Israeli embassy London. http://www.reddit.com/r/reddit.com/comments/ca1bm/pics_demonstration_at_israeli_embassy_london/  PS some upvotes on this submission would be nice cos as soon as I submitted these pics, the post mysteriously got buried hummm.
That picture is from Guatemala, not Honduras.
Same here. I have no problem with solidifying our defense on our own land. But fuck everything about putting money into offshore death. 
You sir, are a dingleberry
the title of this thread might give you a clue.
All great works of art are controversial. 
Ok, but even if homosexuals engaged in copulation in public, they still couldn't actually kill people with their uncouth display.  Whereas, y'know, guns can kill people.   I don't necessarily disagree with you, but   tl;dr apples and oranges
I am so glad your face is shown; your eyes are the hottest thing I've seen in a *long* time!  A treat to go from those deep eyes onto your cute pouty mouth onto those incredible boobs... Oh my!
&gt;[x] The IDF are showing remarkable restraint; They have the power to nuke the entire region but choose not to.  America here.  We have the power to nuke the *planet.* We have had this power for *decades.* And we aren't exactly known for our restraint.
Don't be silly, you don't know what is best for you, someone else does.  It is some noble servant's duty to keep you safe, you should be thankful and keep your hands in front of you where I can see them at all times.  I actually know people like that.  Crazy eh?
:(
Its a sinkhole, a crater implies a collision occurred.
*Gets out masturbation kit.*
Let me point out how stupid you are for a second.  If they were shooting the civilians they would be shooting at the people gathering around where they are repelling in order to clear the area for safe entry.  Thus clearing the deck in order for a safe entry.  Try not to be so damn stupid and it wont warrant trolling responses.
because its at the bottom of the ocean?
so anyone that has beated this one?, the fartest i been legally its about 13-15 dungeon level (some crazy ultra fast moving spear wielding chick kills me all the time, not to mention hydras if im unlucky to bump in to one when im not still able to tear them like a pillow) then i cheated a little and it seems the game doesnt end (now im in the swamp or something like it) so in short how many levels does the  dungeon spawn?
Interesting Fact: The Captcha only needs one word to be right, the other one can be misspelled.
until society discourages young women from escaping accountability by making serious allegations, or at least doesn't bend over backwards to involve police and prosecutors, then it's an unfortunate ticking time bomb. probably safer in mexico.
I didn't intend to exaggerated. Still, I believe the number of human lives saved would outnumber the test animals in the vast majority of cases.
are you talking about waterboarding?
Have we all forgotten bugmenot?
I wear white cotton undershirts to preserve my dress shirts, and I've found that Oxi-Clean used in the wash has removed the pit-stain crusts as well as whitening them. I've been using it for years now, and it's reversed the damage on a lot of clothes. Of course, they still wear out, but now they're usable as car wash rags, etc.
Obviously this is the Tim Burton remake of CARS.
I think this was an instance of kitty suicide :(
No, but give it time and some huckster with a fridge to sell will make us that way. :-(
I just posted on another request page. I am a NYS physics teacher and I would love to teach physics to my fellow redditors. If there is enough interest I'll start the class.   Speaking of which, how do you start a class?
yep he probably won't sleep at night.   EDIT: Don't like the truth eh?
You didn't grab my balls with both hands so it doesn't count?
My hovercraft is full of eels.
i would try http://www.reddit.com/r/wearethemusicmakers
when they say medical records are private, they mean that.  I wouldn't worry about it following you around any more than getting treated for any other medical condition.
Bland?
I think I just myself.
Not very comforting. Again, best of luck to you and yours. I'll keep my fingers crossed.
Wow...  that's some elementary school homophobia.  When he asked for the children to leave the room I expected to see only empty chairs. 
go phillies
&gt;The soldiers should have known better than trying to get on that boat.   the soldiers dont make the decisions kiddo
Hell yeah, that was amazing!
Look, if you are getting bullied, there is only one way to stop it: confront and stand up to them (I suggest one at a time). If you have to fight, then fight. They won't look at you as easy meat, anymore. If they decide to escalate matters as a response, you can easily provoke them into doing something stupid. Be smart about it.
Ah, most of the bullies I knew enjoyed punching people just as much as making fun of them. 
http://www.toms.com/mens
Yeah I don't even own a TV...  Seriously though, like any other cinematic device it can be used well and misused also.
Can somebody tell me what the hell they're doing with the saw?
2 week cruise on a boat with 10 other people in the Galapagos islands for a family Christmas.  Doesn't get better than that. 
you guys obviously didn't realize that his isn't even the troll in question. It's a homonym. Stop feeding trolls, regardless.
Not as happy as....as.....as....  Welp...someone got lucky.
&gt;So what's the US going to do here? Turkey is a strategic ally and so is Israel.  With the end of Cold War, I haven't really considered Israel to be a strategic ally. 
It makes the Japanese sound Goofy.
I really want to start a guinea pig rescue (when I have the resources.) How did your cat rescue get started? 
It's pointless to pretend to report "objectively" where you state the facts and get the statements of both sides as if both sides have equal grounding in reality. Then sometimes there are more than two sides of a story where the mainstream opinions are both wrong.  A journalist's job is not to be a stenographer.
and we complain about our potholes?
MSE is not licensed for business use.  They offer the Forefront product for businesses.
Do you accept writer submissions?   Do you have advice on getting published in the magazine industry?   What work history led to you getting this job?  Thanks for doing this, cool AMA!
Someone downvoted The Third Man?!   I'm going to have to go watch it again now, just to reconfirm its sheer bloody brilliance.
Oh, shut up you Israeli sympathizer. Stop pretending your outrage has to do with the editorializing of the posts  rather than the negative view of Israel.   Go read this idiots comment history. Fucking schmuck. There is an Israeli flag-draped dick hanging right out of his mouth. These Israeli schills always like to play the 'rules' game when it works in their favor; It's how they censor negative publicity. 
Grats to someone who understands his own constitution.
Same thing with Bad Boys.
As a patent-hater myself, I focus my hatred on the more abstract subset of patents, i.e. software patents, dna patents, business process patents and visual design patents (and patents that claim to be something else but are thinly disguised instances of the former.)  I don't know that many people have a problem with "here's a neat device I invented, and here's how I built it" patents.
The Tribes series
It's faster and all the extensions I used with Firefox work with Chrome.
Well, yeah, but they all say that because China imposes massive economic sanctions on anyone who says different.  Likewise, the political parties in Taiwan who don't call for independence take that position not because they don't want it but because they don't want to get the shit bombed out of them by declaring independence.  Threatening to bomb/embargo people unless they agree with you and then shouting "Hey, look, everyone agrees with me, I must be right!" is not really a valid argument. (However realpolitik it may be)
Defeats the purpose of having your tower plugged into a surgeprotector. :(
Well, they certainly haven't been so popular for 34 years. I'd say they're a fad, or at least in trend, for the moment.  
So by that logic, there is no such thing as an innocent Norwegian male either.  &gt; *Norway has mandatory military service for men (6–12 months of training) and voluntary service for women.* -- Wikipedia
FYI I voted for her in 2008. I get mocked by people all the time when I tell them I voted for her.   I usually tell people I didn't vote for Obama, but he is certainly much better than McCain/Palin, but still a huge disappointment.
You heard wrong obviously. You are no socialist if you don't understand the ABCs of international solidarity
non-existent?  Did you see the comments on youtube about the Negros and how black people are all violent 
Ha! Jokes.
https://www.dropbox.com/referrals/NTU4NDg3NDU5  VID of my GF. (shits hot!)  NWS: http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=cRxW5LeixCg&amp;feature=player_embedded
You just bees Melvin from trucktown to fill it with concrete!
&gt;Ever tried corn without butter or salt on it?  Yes.  Good fresh sweet yellow corn needs a quick dip in boiling water and nothing else.  Get old and/or crappy corn and you need butter and/or salt.  Or cook it too long, as most people seem to do.
Thanks this is actually relevant to my interest. Now i need a practical career that would pay well enough for me to live off of, and I will hopefully enjoy.
I hate to nitpick (actually I lie, I love to nitpick because I am an ass), but Occam's razor doesn't exactly say that the simplest answer is more likely to be correct. Occam was a 14th century logician, and what he actually said was something along the lines of "do not unnecessarily multiply your objects", which is considerably less snappy. As far as I am aware, he was refering to the number of conceptual objects a theory requires to work; if two theories adequately explain the observed evidence, then pick the one with fewest moving parts.
Problem with big screens is that they'll eat up battery (more space to light up, and it seems that the battery life is pretty crappy on the EVO as it is), and it's also pocket space you're sacrificing. Not a big deal for most, but for some, that's pretty important.
In this story, I wasn't technically yelled at, but it is amusing.  After high school, I hung out with one guy and one girl a lot. (I'm a girl as well) We were walking down the street, and had linked arms. A cab driver saw us, and we literally saw his head whip around to get another look. It was quite funny. 
http://fuddit.com/
i got a quick question because i really have only a hazy notion of what the hell is goin on over there in Israel and Palestine. It's my understanding that Israel didn't exist until after WWII, then the powers that be decided that the jews went through a lot and said "here's some land, enjoy". And ever since then the Isrealis have been fucking over the people that lived there before them. I just want to know if i'm right or wrong here. My common sense tells me i'm wrong because who in their right mind would support Isreal if that's the case. But i have it in my mind that i'm right for some reason
Living without food and water for 14 days under observation is a very tame claim. If a medical text book is anything to go by, I can survive that long without food. If a person is bathing after accounting for absorption through skin and accidental ingestion, a person training himself in starvation may be able to do 14 days. Now let's say he does take the challenge, passes for 14 days and all of a sudden he has an amazing amount of new found credibility because Randi was too busy mocking him for his belief. Something ordinary gets registered as a miracle.
No one likes a narc. 
You look more like [Jason Lee](http://www.moviesnobs.net/wp-content/uploads//jason_lee.jpg) every time you take another picture.
His or her point was self-defeating. As you said in your comment the problem is circular. This is because another of the social problems linked to mass unskilled immigration is precisely the disproportionately high ratio of birthrates. So you now have two problems: first you need to accommodate the waves of new immigrants each year, and then you need to provide for the descendants of the immigrants already here. State resources are finite, the higher the number of people the more scattered resources will be allocated, with the consequence of proportionately decreasing the quality and impact of those services and making them unable to do their intended jobs. If you take a look at the educational institutions in the marginal areas of Paris you will see what I'm saying. 
Trolling.
I have noticed when I play by myself queueing as a level 6, there are a ton of leavers. When I play with my friends who are level 30, very rarely do you get leavers.
Nah.. I get it. Whenever you say "Fiancee" (unless they know the whole story) I get "Congratulations! When is the date?" Super annoying when the answer is: "Hopefully in the next 5 years." Right now I just tell ppl we bought the house and next up is the wedding. =)
The main difference is that the thesis is less helpful to the uninitiated.   The book contains a few extra introductory chapters that are quite helpful in grasping the basics of purely functional data structures.
Excellent advice. I do scan myself, on a flatbed, so I doubt I'm scratching them there. I assumed it was the processing machine at the lab. I'll try the oil trick and also blow out my camera. Thanks.
Stolen from xkcd.
Official story is that IDF was under "small fire", but not a single gun is shown in the video! So metal pipes (could be used in construction), slingshots, smoketorch flares, wooden sticks, a hammer, a wrench, knives, a monkey wrench, sodyum klorür (anti-inflammatory drug still attached to an IV!!!), other tools must be WEAPONS.
Hmm... I've never noticed my hands being hot, and, living in Texas, I've certainly run in some hot weather (like Saturday, when it was 96F by the time I got my procrastinating butt out there).  Anyway, you could try, if you stop for water, pouring some of it onto your hands and splashing it onto your face.  (And/or pouring it on your head, shirt, legs, and basically anywhere but inside your shoes.)  Once you start moving again, the evaporative cooling will noticeably cool off anything that's still wet.  Sticking to the shade as much as possible helps too.
Go for it and participate in it, okay? I know this will sound weird but it's really really important: go in front and CHEER everytime Sarah Palin talks. You'll rise up in the ranks of the organization. Then when you are important enough, have sex with Sarah Palin and steal her place as the next legitimate president of the United States.
Nah man, Jimi doesn't smoke remember?
My housemate (and supposedly friend) decided it was a 'smart' idea to film me in the bathroom without my knowledge.  My boyfriend and I found the evidence. Kicked him out. Reported him to the police. Never spoke to him again.  I don't regret doing so at all.  At the time I felt completely violated and it took me awhile to get over that breach of trust. However there's a Victims of Crime Tribunal in my country/state that awards compensation to victims. It took a year but now because of that creep I'm going on a (almost) all expenses paid holiday.  --Edit--  Just wanted to add this. When I found out what was going on I was pretty much destroyed. It was a horrible thing to find out and it really messed with me. I felt that my trust and safety had been completely violated, in my own home, by someone I thought I could trust and was a close friend. I went through hell and and back.  I think you should tell the gf whats going on. Give her some power to do something about the situation. Be it to forgive, to get rid of her bf, to report him to the police, whatever. She most likely wont want to go to the police, its a terrifying thing to do, however if she does he most likely wont get jail time or anything like that.  I'm from Australia, so different laws, however the guy who stalked me got a private police record (employers can't see it) so he's known to them from now on if he ever did this again (and a second time he would DEFINITELY get a harsher punishment). I don't know if he had any further punishment (fine or community service).  Anyway if she went to the police she can file a report but doesn't have to press charges. The police can help her (you?) decide the best course of action.
This is really great, thanks for sharing this with me
My older brother had a pair, and I was so jealous of them.  My mom refused to buy me a pair.
That's probably why "a few brown spots" is the perfect ripeness: you start to get the sweetness of the brown spots, but it hasn't ruined the texture yet.
Ok, what about the second time?
Had to google frottage. Learned a new word!
Seriously?  You badmouth /r/men, then post in here?  Because we're better than /r/gents, I'll unban it. :P
agreed!!
Yeah: Thanks for the Escalation Obama! Damn Liar...
Ugh, I have three.   I think they conspire such that at least one blower is always running.
Fake. The police in that picture are Canadian...  http://www.cbsatlanta.com/news/23745881/detail.html
Upvoted mostly because I'm interested in the research history on acupuncture, and this led to some great readin.
You're reading way too much into it. If you've been together for 4.5 years and an argument like this seems like a big deal, it's a very good relationship.  You were sick, he was frustrated, you had an argument. Its nothing.  In future, a proper response is 'fuck you too' and leave it at that.
How can I not upvote this.
Topanga made me realize that I love women's legs.
won't the pancakes get cold in the wind?
On a completely different subreddit and not everyone sees something the first time it comes around. Or even the fifth time. So what does it matter? If you've seen it, hide it and move along.
Somewhere there's a redneck telling stories about the big one that got away...
mind=BLOWN
You wont stand a chance against my motherfucking chicken.
نتيجة الثانوية العامة : سيتم متابعة نتيجة الثانوية العامة المصرية للعام الدراسي 2009 - 2010 على ثلاث محاور اساسية ان شاء الله   قرر الدكتور أحمد زكى بدر وزير التربية والتعليم المصري الأحد مجازاة جميع القائمين على وضع امتحان اللغة العربية للامتحانات التجريبية لشهادة الثانوية العامة بخصم 15 يوما وكذلك منعهم من الاشتراك فى الامتحانات نهائيا. كما قرر الدكتور أحمد زكى بدر نقل واضعى امتحان اللغة العربية ومراجعيه من مكتب مستشار اللغة العربية بالديوان إلى محافظة القليوبية مع خصم 15 يوما. وقد جاءت قرارت وزير التربية والتعليم نتيجة للأخطاء التى حدثت فى ورقة الأسئلة الخاصة فى امتحان اللغة العربية السبت فى أول أيام الامتحانات التجريبية, حيث شهد الامتحان أسئلة من منهج الفصل الدراسى الثانى وليس الأول كما جاء فى تعليمات الوزارة فى هذا الشأن. كان الدكتور أحمد زكى بدر قد أكد أن نسبة الحضور فى أول أيام الامتحانات التجريبية لطلاب الثانوية العامة فى مصر بالمرحلتين الأولى والثانية تراوحت مابين 97% إلى 100% في مختلف المحافظات مشيرا إلى أن هذا الاقبال والحضور يساعد الطلاب على معرفة مستواهم الفعلى نظرا لأن الامتحانات معدة مركزيا من قبل الوزارة. وقال بدر إن حضور الطلبة للامتحان ليس اجباريا ولكن الغياب عنه سوف يحتسب ضمن أيام الغياب المقررة قانونا ومن تزيد مدة غيابه عن النصاب القانوني لن يسمح له بدخول امتحان أخر العام مشيرا إلى أن اليوم الدراسى بالمدارس الثانوية استمر بشكل عادى دون تغيير كما قررت وكيل وزراة التربية والتعليم بالفيوم سلوى أمين إحالة ثلاثة من مديرى الإدارات التعليمية "طامية -الفيوم -غرب الفيوم" للتحقيق على خلفية ما تردد عن تسرب أسئلة الامتحانات التجريبية للثانوية العامة. وكانت أجهزة الأمن قد استدعت عددا من أصحاب المكتبات الذين يبيعون النماذج للطلاب, حيث أفاد أحدهم بأنه يطبعها نقلا عن بعض المواقع الإليكترونية التى وضعت نماذج للأسئلة وجاءت مطابقة للامتحانات. جدير بالذكر أن عددا من مكتبات مدينة الفيوم ومدينة طامية عرضت للبيع نموذج الامتحان يبلغ 125 قرشا كتكلفة للتصوير   وقال عمارة إن تشديد إجراءات تأمين امتحانات الثانوية العامة والفنية هذا العام تقتضى حظر ارتداء النقاب منعاً للغش من باب الابتعاد عن الشبهات، مشيراً إلى أن المديرية ستطبق تعليمات سلامة الامتحانات بحذافيرها هذا العام وبدءاً من اليوم.  وشدد محمود العرينى، مدير المديرية التعليمية بالجيزة، على أن تعليمات الوزارة واضحة بشأن النقاب، وتفيد بمنع الطالبات من ارتدائه داخل اللجان. وأضاف أن المديرية ملتزمة بما تمليه الوزارة عليها من تعليمات.  وتابع أن "المنتقبة ترتدي النقاب خارج المدرسة وهذا شأنها لكن داخل اللجان ممنوع لأن هناك قواعد داخل لجان الامتحان لا بد أن يتم احترامها، وذلك بحسب تصريحات صحفية لصحيفة "اليوم السابع".  من جانبه قال مصدر مطلع بوزارة التربية والتعليم، إن هذا الإجراء من أجل تطبيق قوانين مفادها منع الممتحنين من ارتداء أي أزياء تخالف الزى المدرسي ومن بينها غطاء الوجه، مشيراً إلى أن دخول أي طالب إلى اللجنة يتبعه إجراء مهم وهو التأكد من تطابق شكله مع صورته الموجودة على بطاقة الدخول للامتحان، وهو ما يستلزم وضوح وجوه الممتحنين.   وعلى جانب اخر قدم 50 نائبا بمجلس الشعب اليوم، مذكرة عاجلة إلى الدكتور أحمد فتحى سرور رئيس المجلس يعترضون فيها على قيام لجنة التعليم بفض الاجتماع الذى كان مقرراً له مناقشة عدد من طلبات الإحاطة حول تضرر آلاف الأسر المصرية من جدول امتحانات الثانوية العامة بعد مرور 10 دقائق فقط من بداية الاجتماع.  بدأت الأزمة بوصف النائب رجب حجازى جدول امتحانات الثانوية العامة بأنه مخالف للدستور ولمبدأ المساواة فى الحقوق والواجبات، مدللاً على ذلك بمادة الأحياء التى لا يفصلها عن المادة التى تسبقها سوى يوم إجازة، وطالب النائب بتغيير يوم امتحان مادة الأحياء من 16 يونيو إلى 26 يونيو.  فى هدوء شديد أكد الدكتور رضا أبو سريع وكيل وزارة التربية والتعليم أنه لا يمكن وضع جدول امتحان يرضى جميع الطلاب، موضحاً أن الفاصل بين المواد الدراسية فى الجدول للمراجعة فقط وليست للمذاكرة، فانفعل النائب محمد الصحفى، مؤكدا أن جدول الامتحانات مخالف للدستور فقاطعه وكيل الوزارة قائلا الدستور ليس له علاقة بالثانوية العامة فيما صرخ النائب الإخوانى على لبن قائلا الاجتماع باطل لعدم اكتمال النصاب ومخالفة للائحة.  وعلى الفور رفع عبد العزيز مصطفى وكيل المجلس الذى ترأس الاجتماع لعدم حضور العدد المطلوب من النواب، تشابك النائبان محمد الصحفى ورجب حجازى مع لبن قائلين له الله يسامحك ضيعت حقوقنا ابقى قابلنا لو اجتمعنا تانى اللجنة والحكومة متواطئين مع بعض وما صدقوا يهربوا.  كما انفعل النائب زكريا يونس قائلا وكيل الوزارة جاى يعلمنا الدستور والحكومة بتتعامل مع جدول الامتحان كأنه قرأن مش عايزه تغيره.  واتفق النواب على مطالبة الدكتور سرور بسرعة حسم هذا الأمر سريعا لاقتراب موعد امتحانات الثانوية العامة خاصة أن اللجنة فضت الاجتماع دون تحديد موعد آخر.
TIME: "POP-UP ADS SUCK!@!#!@"  ME: Clicks on Pop-Up Ad Story...  Popup comes up. FFFFFFFFUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUU
HOLE E SHIT!
having a touch screen and stylus made this too easy. :(
Holey Shit...
Diaspora.
Has someone hijacked Pilebsa's account? He's posting daily mail and facebook stories.
This would be a nightmare. Teams that either just make the playoffs or just miss them are in tough, with very little chance of drafting an impact player and going through the entire rebuild phase.   The dreaded middle of the road teams...
Arguably everything anybody ever does is because of their feelings.
Maybe you can take this opportunity to quit and take up better hobbies. You don't have to, but I'm assuming you don't want to play this MMO forever, so why not quit now?
and now it's not...
Right I take back pussy and say fearful sheep following the flock/uneducated attitude.  It was a little mean of me.  And I completely understand the idea of not wanting to be punished for something.  And if you look at what I wrote you'll see I stated that propaganda and corporate control is what caused this.  This isn't black or white, attitude and lazy intellect have as much their part in not changing this problem. We have access to tons of information and are now able to make rational decisions and formulate our own opinions.  I would disagree that attitude and a drive to learn isn't a huge part of the problem.  Bing lazy, not learning and 'taking peoples words for it" is a problem in many many aspects of our society not just prohibition.  Why should any body just listen to us they need to find the answers for themselves its up to us to help people educate themselves as best we can.  Btw many people who don't smoke at all, never mind twice a year still know that this prohibition is unjust and wrong and will openly say so.   Edit: Also why can't I expect people to decide for themselves whats propaganda and what isn't and make their own decisions.  I'm not gay but I can reasonable decide that what someone does is their own business even if i don't understand it.  I don't even need to 'sift' through every thing about gay rights, I can make that decision based on the information that is put right in front of me. 
Great goal! I think enviro sci should be a required class, or at least better integrated into biology or earth science. 
Ha! I live right there!  I agree with the award by the way.
You should when you get the chance. The only thing is IIRC it's more expensive than Olive Garden generally (and I can't imagine you make much).
Could you elaborate on your opposition of the Vatican. It seems to me that the actions of The Vatican and the roman catholic church are inherently the same while Israel and judiaism are not.
I'm not sure. I have unlimited both. Sorry.... 
I can tell you put a lot of thought into that.
Ah. Thank you!
I don't know that I've ever ended up *dripping* sweat, no, but I often get fairly sweaty and overheated.  So, all things considered, I guess this isn't that helpful a comment.  Sorry.
its good to preface anything on the internet with it.  
I'm sorry your day hasn't been so bright. I have to admit though that you sure brightened mine.   You are stunning.   Smile.
If the Israeli Commandos had stayed on their own ship, they wouldn't have been in any danger, right? No-one put a gun to their head and made 'em get on the helicopter or in the zodiac, right?  They went looking for trouble, and found it, and now want to play the victim?   Nope.  No-one's buying the horseshit this time around.
teh tin foil hat will come in handy when i build my microwave gun...
"The URL contained a malformed video ID. "  and "Japanesepodcast101.com cannot be found" :(  I like the other links though! Thanks
Yes, but only if the post is edited to as to no longer be critical of Israeli foreign policy.
http://ibnlive.in.com/news/turkey-threatens-action-israel-on-alert/116743-2.html  &gt;Ankara warned that further supply vessels will be sent to Gaza, escorted by the Turkish Navy, a development with unpredictable consequences.
spiders.
And you can then be shot for disobeying a direct order. It's a tough choice in the heat of the moment.
safety
As a budding journalist, I have two questions for you:  - What do you look for in queries/pitches? - How did you work your way up the ladder?
i got charizard in my first pack and thought it was like any other card.
How can you swim if you are carrying half a dozen guns, large quantities of cash, ammo and various other items?  Plus you wouldn't want your hat to get wet anyway.
Wankers! If you're going to throw money away, give it to someone that needs it. 
"Mine", "fire". 
And we thank u for ur addiction 
Another fine example of we report(the parts we want to), you decide.
It was a better outcome than the [pizza parlour video](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=HMIuG3HvV0Y), no one even lifted a finger to help in that one. Reddit post: http://www.reddit.com/r/WTF/comments/c9s92/shit_gets_real_in_pizza_parlor/
It isn't worse until the "Main Street Media" says so.
It seems a lot of the things that should have had native Linux clients in the first place are now getting native Linux clients. Like Steam.
you have to turn on zoom in universal access (it's off by default). you can toggle it on and off with ⌥⌘8. ⌥⌘= and ⌥⌘- won't work if zoom is turned off.
I'm sure this cop never abused his power in traffic stops or other situations. 
As long as you keep me in a big salt water swimming pool and let me sing alllll day long. 
idiot.
You may have misunderstood me.  I did not mean to imply that I take the most radical positions of extreme alternative theorists on those issues or that I do not understand the seriousness of those general topics. And my point was not related to those particular issues, but rather that 1) those issues do coincide with the ones that individuals are suggesting are being used to manipulate people emotionally for political or other purposes, and 2) the second part of my point being that the list also corresponds largely to the things she put in this recent article.  I will briefly touch on those issues you mentioned, although again, I think we have to separate those issues from the actual points I was making and from one another.  Do you agree on 1 and 2?  &gt; An outbreak of flu without proper medicine to treat it will, as a matter of fact, fuck the shit out of us.   As a matter of fact, flu outbreaks happen all of the time, and when people get sick, they fight the infection with their immune system.  Most do not have the shit fucked out of them (although that is a finer point, based on your interpretation of the expression and flu experiences), and most flu vaccines are considered (by their proponents) to be more important for people with compromised immune systems and generally poor health.   &gt; The only reason the swine flu and influenza in general haven't killed us off is because of modern medicine. Think about it.  The main belief is that the swine flu vaccinations were probably unnecessary and promoted to governments for purposes of profit.  That's not really especially closely related or contradictory to this one about swine flu or influenza killing off the human population without modern medicine.  Which modern medical technologies do you believe our lacking would have led to the extinction or decimation of the human population from flu outbreaks?  &gt;Food shortage is a problem: in India and China, people are starving to death  I agree with you there.  &gt; because crops are failing  I think that, given the nature of our global transportation and other systems, we cannot point to crop failure alone as the main reason for starving people in India and China.  &gt; Simply because you live in the lap of luxury and have the privilege of buying your food off the shelves   My belief is that you are getting closer to the root of the food problem there then the suggestion that the issue was mainly crop failure.  I think that we have extremely unfair and wasteful food distribution systems.
What is so funny is that the guy appears to be clueless in this clip. Though I doubt that he was.
Does that mean my penis wants to fuck everything?
You could say you gave that fly a piss of your mind?
REAL girls are fat.
Get out of my head! GET OUT OF MY HEAD!
In my opinion it is people like you who stand in the way of peace--people who oppose Israel's crimes but can't channel their energy into productive activism, and either aren't familiar with or aren't willing to acknowledge the serious and meaningful gains we have already made towards peace. So instead you sit at home and conjure up fantasy scenarios about a regional referendum, extrapolate demographic data to apocalyptic ends, and come up with weird philosophy about the survivability of "a country which defines itself on race and religion."  Generations of work and struggle went into UN 242 and the two state settlement in order to make realistic the goal of peace in the Middle East. We're at a point now where we have the international community, international law, and the human rights organizations on our side--and now you want to throw all that activism out the window because of some inane assumptions you personally hold about the nature of Israel? Get serious.
Can Macs not disable audio for a running application?  I'd pursue that front, I'd say it's more likely than a Firefox extension.  You could block any audio files with ad block, but to disable audio on a flash app without a built in setting... I've no idea.  Can you do that in your flash settings?
&gt;To the present reader, this label might be confusing, since it is not at all the experimental method of the modern empirical sciences.  Hmm...so this guy's "empirical" work contained no quatitative analysis. Not even any testable hypotheses.  Yeah, the author is absolutely right - someone well versed in the "modern" empirical sciences would have no idea why the fuck anyone thinks this guy did anything "empirical."
I could tell just by her hair length :D
glad you left them for their mama... baby rabbits do not survive without their mothers milk ( very rare to be able to nurse them to adulthood) You did the right thing
It was a great IRL troll. It was also very uncharacteristic for her personality, which was why I enjoyed it so thoroughly.
Indeed.  I suggest that this thread be deleted ASAP to preserve reddit's virginal purity.
Avira false positives are a problem.
Basketball cards, Pogs, super baggy jeans, "No Fear" brand, "Alienware" brand. Growing up in the 90's was awesome...
شدد الدكتور أحمد زكي بدر وزير التربية والتعليم على أن أي تلاعب سوف يظهر في لجان امتحانات الثانوية العامة سوف يقابل بكل حزم ويعرض المسئولين عن تنفيذ التعليمات الصادرة بشأن هذه اللجان للعقاب القاسي. كما قرر حظر توزيع طلاب الثانوية العامة المتقدمين للامتحانات بنظام المنازل علي لجان المناطق النائية في 19 محافظة من محافظات الجمهورية إلا بشروط قاسية. 
It's Bush's fault!
This seems to me like your typical case of "Wrong place, wrong time."
http://windowsupdate.com  Well, not really.
that is awesome!
How philosophosophical.
It might be interesting to generate a graph of how often each library is referenced by other libraries in Hackage, or by github projects, etc.  Combined with graphs of how often updates are issued on that library, this might give users a very good idea of which ones are most actively used and supported.
I don't really understand...
It is a board on 4chan.  [wg](http://boards.4chan.org/wg/) stands for wallpapers-general (as opposed to /w/ which is anime wallpapers).   NEVER browse it where someone could see you, there is a lot of NSFW stuff.  People there are generally pretty chill, and willing to give advice on your desktop if you ask politely.
For the love of
Yep.  I've been through that a few times myself.  I have a recurrent depression dx though it might be some nonstandard configuration of bipolar. meds help.  therapy helps.  friends help.  family helps.
Going back how far? 10 years, 100 years, 1000 years, 2000 years?
Fat people should be accepted, being fat shouldn't.  Obese people should not be persecuted, but at the same time they should understand that it's an evolutionarily negative characteristic.  The article seems to link alot of garbage data, and makes it seem like every person who is fat, is so because of genetics and can't be helped.  Yes, this is certainly the case in some of the obese population, but alot of it is due to laziness, and "fat acceptance" is only going to feed this laziness more, and further endanger lives.   Let's cover her points:  1)  The first article linked shows one study, that is completely based on BMI and uses the terms "obese" and "overweight" in relation to BMI.  In the end of this article she vividly points out that "BMI is complete horseshit."   The same article references a study of fatter people being more likely to survive cardiac event.  The only problem was that those studied already had cardiac conditions.  The main argument is that obesity (or the lifestyle that LEADS to obesity) leads to heart disease, not makes you more or less likely to die from an already existing condition. This entire first point seems to misinterpret the fact that you CAN be healthy while fat, but the lifestyle that causes most to be fat will make you unhealthy.  2)  This point makes sense, although terribly put together.  "Obesity" and "eating crap and not exercising" are not synonymous, but they sure as hell are linked.  Yes, the skinny people that eat crap and don't exercise are in danger, but they are also a rarity.  The majority of people who live this life style, are you guessed it, fat.  3) She states that "Noone has proven that fat people generally eat more or exercise less than thin people."  Noone has proven that they do or don't, but it has been proven that a better diet (note BETTER, this isn't a quantity of food issue, it is a quality) and exercise (also quality vs quantity of exercise here) reduce the amount of body fat. 4) She states that Diets (In the case of this article she means a short term diet to lose weight) do not work, yet does not consider a permanent change in your everyday diet.  Of course a diet isn't going to work if you do it for two weeks, and then go back to eating shit, how is it a surprise that weight gets put back on?  You also will not lose weight if the diet you are trying is shit itself (which most of them are).   5) (See 4)  6) People do stupidly extreme things to lose weight, for god sakes, some don't eat, and strangely noone is debating the negative health effects of anorexia.  A healthy diet is NOT going to cause health problems (unless you eat a diet that isnt healthy for you, i.e. allergies etc.)  7)  Agreed, but that doesn't mean I'm going to chose an overweight person over a "normal" weight person to be on my sports team, or even to be my spouse (NOTE - This is ignoring outside factors, such as bitchiness or general sports ineptitude etc)  8)  She pretty much says what she said in point 7, almost verbatim...  point is, people try to stop people from smoking, people try to stop people from jumping off buildings and bridges, why not try to stop them from doing other unsafe things, like living dangerous lifestyles?  9)  Yes, shame will only make the problem worse, I agree with this.  If someone wants to live lazily eating whatever they want, it's not hurting anyone, let them.  But they have little right to complain about being fat and how they don't get the same treatment as skinny people when they do little to fix it.  10) Corporations try to make money, they blow things out of proportion, we get it, humans are still far too fat, and those numbers are increasing.  Organisms don't evolve over a couple hundred years, it is clear that it is our habits, not our genetics causing an increase in obesity rates.  This is the truth, and corporations are trying to make money off of it, possibly by blowing it a little out of proportion.  However, they are not making it up. Also, no comment is complete without the obligatory "I evolved to want the most physically fit, attractive companion, and my genetics make me want a skinny person."
Tits.
Downvoted for "M$"
YOU FUCKING ROCK!!  I've been looking for the study for a couple of months now ever since I watched that BBC documentary on 'why are some people thin?'
he's speaking metaphorically
Well to be honest robotlovemachine isn't the quickest buzz in the briefs.
I'll buy the shirt from this posting if it makes it to the front page with over 1000 upvotes.
Where?  I haven't seen Jewcifer around in a month or so.
yes!! grilled corn. 
Absolutely.  I am catching them at Bonnaroo and I have no problem sitting on the grass for their concert, I actually prefer it.
drat! I've been outed!
Good. I hope they get it on already. The middle east can only be solved through bloodshed. We know who was right and who was righteous when the smoke clears. Whoever is still standing was right all along as far as i am concerned.
Why are you even *in* this thread?
I just use the touch site. The only thing I've noticed it doesn't do is pokes.
Way to shift those goalposts!  I was only pointing out that your soup comparison was totally inappropriate.  
I use the greasemonkey script reddit-filter plus.  Hides any post with certain keywords.  Next best thing to removing r/politics from my reddit.
Red was a poor choice
I am so freaking tired of hearing people parrot this argument. Free speech is a general principle. It does not apply only to government. Yes, it is perfectly legal for Fb to take off whatever it wants, but that does not mean it is not a free speech issue. That's like saying that because Fb is a private business it isn't censorship.   No it's not a right, people who now their rights now that. But there is a difference between freedom of speech as a law and freedom of speech as a general principle. Private companies are not exempt from the moral obligation of upholding the principles of a free democratic society, the fruits of which they continually enjoy. Business can most certainly be judged by the morality of what they do above and beyond what is legally required of them. That's why everyone's so pissed at BP.  I don't mind pedantry so long as you think before you speak. This is exactly the kind of thinking that allows corporations to run roughshod over the American people. 
Shit, there are plenty of people in the U.S. that are stupid enough to believe the "official" version of the events of 9/11. I'm sure they'll believe this lie too...
If I lived there Id fucking move pronto. The whole city is on top of a cave...
And that there is nothing I need to go online to finish the single player portion.
Yeah, but not a cheap one. And not one made recently.
American Beauty.  Accurate, heart felt portrayals. Brilliant acting. You know he is going to die and yet it is still a shock when it happens. Dialogue is perfect. Kevin Spacey is the man. It's just incredible.
Well then I can confirm I'm not because sadly, I've never been to Australia :(   Thanks! :D
/16. Niagara Falls, NY
Summer afternoon, just got home from work, on the porch watching the ocean: dried mango coated in chili powder and sugar with a Stone Ruination. Hot damn. Sweet, spicy, hoppy, earthy...  Another good one with an IPA is fresh sliced jicama spears with a lime squeezed over them, then rolled in chili powder.
American History X for me
Did you write?
So you are demanding a youtube title that reads as long as a court transcript? I don't understand your post.
Simple solution to fix that: everything your government is doing that you think is wrong is 100% legit because they were elected into power through the system by which the country operates.  As long as things are done through proper channels in the system, you can't stop them just because you don't like them.  You can't change how taxes are allocated.  You can't change where your military is deployed (not directly).  You CAN change who is in power.  Bitching and whining about all the things your government does that you hate gets nobody anywhere.  If you feel that strongly, volunteer with the office of your local representative, and get the message out that drastic change is needed.  Alternatively, go to school, move up the ranks, become someone who *can* directly affect change.  Complaining may be cathartic, but it won't fix anything.  People with strong believes and stronger convictions are what change society.  If you want to be one of those people, I salute you and wish you nothing but success.  Otherwise, feel free to have some cheese with that whine.  Also, to be fair, nuclear-powered aircraft carriers *do* move away from dependence on fossil fuels.
Nnnnnneeeeeeeeeeeeoooooooooowwwwwn!  That onomatopoeia is one of the best I have ever seen/said!
just call it Indian.  Hindu is a practitioner of Hinduism and Hindi is a language.
I just sent you a blurry picture of my cousin and I... Enjoy my email address.
Then they should remove ALL pretenses of any type of freedom. They need to say up front, they are a bunch of Nazi Religious Fundies that will slap you down if you say things they or their userbase doesn't like.  Americans need to drop facebook altogether. It isn't anything but a datamining-moneymaking machine anyway - hell the CIA/FBI snoops it all the time. Without American support, facebook will fold. Good luck with you JEW owned social network, Muhammadans.
Council tax is a yearly tax paid to the local government to help provide local services.  The amount is based on the value of where you live.
"You need a ride?"  then, after I said no thanks, "can I have sex witch you?"  Uhno.
Never have I felt more like a mouse in a maze...
**IT'S ALL SO CLEAR NOW**
No, I can honestly say that the 'A' is most definitely uppercase.
more like cerebral lawlsy
Nice big apple ya got there, dude.  
Are there things that anybody should not allowed to stop their tax dollars from going toward?
Can't hurt.  Carcillo should make things interesting at the very least.  His job is going to be to simply aggravate the Hawks and draw penalties.  He's going to do what everyone hates him for.
A lot of it looks like colored pencil, right? It's all very awesome. He might use a large amount of white colored pencil to make the colors blend together more. OP, see if your brother wants to try oils. He can get some trippy colors with them. It's also a much more flowy/loose medium.
Amsterdam.
[Begging the Question](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Petitio_principii).   Assuming your statement is true, this was a state-sponsored act of war (arguably) using standard military forces (albeit in the gray area of national law) not a trans-national guerrilla group using suicide bombers and IEDs against military and civilian targets. Had they used frogmen to blow up the screws then set the ship ablaze, it would be closer to the level of violence that we are accustomed to seeing from the so-labeled "Muslim violence."  Still, it's a rhetorical question, a inflammatory remark, and propaganda in its own right.  I'm not qualified to answer other than to urge caution before we draw parallels between disjoint and dissimilar events whose only common threads are the possibility of "al queda involvement" and being broadcast on television in America.
Do you think they had a right to board in the first place?   Although I am now convinced that these activists are far from "peaceful" as is the theme running through Reddit right now.
Marijuana raped my girlfriend.  It was either that or me on PCP.
Any idea why it's getting down voted?
What about PDFs, Flash, Java, etc?
Simon Peyton-Jones in an [interview](http://www.computerworld.com.au/article/261007/a-z_programming_languages_haskell/?pp=10) published on 19 September, 2008: *[...] Haskell has a sort of unofficial slogan: avoid success at all costs. I think I mentioned this at a talk I gave about Haskell a few years back and it’s become sort of a little saying. When you become too well known, or too widely used and too successful (and certainly being adopted by Microsoft means such a thing), suddenly you can’t change anything anymore. You get caught and spend ages talking about things that have nothing to do with the research side of things. [...] Now, however, they’re starting to complain if their libraries don’t work, which means that we’re beginning to get caught in the trap of being too successful.*  Just sayin'. I have nothing against Haskell, but objectives do seem to have shifted.
I think there's a package for you next to the elevator with your name on it.
I see your understanding of religion is limited. Faith has nothing to do with physical certainty. Theism isn't about following some old teachings, it's about belief in God.  Anyone that does not believe in the of existence of God is not a theist. They might study religion or even identify with certain tenets, but that does not make them a theist.   If you're not certain what God is (or if God exists), then you are an agnostic. Agnostics can be called 'atheists', but they could also be called 'possible theists'. Defining someone by what they *could* be or by what they *aren't* is hardly helpful.  Ultimately, if you require evidence to believe in Gods existence then you are an anti-theist, as theist do not require evidence to believe in God. I know these definitions seem a bit black and white, but people are quite capable of determining where they stand on the issues.  People are, of course, capable of changing their minds. I just think it's important that we be aware of what we are, else we risk losing ourselves completely.
That's called an Oinker.  You lose all your points.
You are more than welcome. :)
Old. I would prefer Mech Warrior 5.
You don't seem to get it.  Yes, i could get stronger by lifting a 5 pound weight 1,000 times.  But I'll get a lot stronger lifting 100 pounds 5 times.
christ, it's me.
Keep the motherfucking crying to yourself, fucktard.
Some do. Not all.
It's to some degree a test of Obama's resolve. If Israel can "get away" with this with only a slap on the wrist, they've demonstrated - once again -- that with AIPAC's help, the US will never do more than slap Israel on the wrist.  So expect that this will be followed by further Israeli unwillingness to negotiate on settlements or Gaza policy.
YOU SIR ARE WRONG.  ON THE INTERNET.
Not if they value their existence.
Upvote for Broken Social Scene.
&gt;It's so trivial but then everyone talks like atheism-or-theism was a dichotomy, while it's not.  Sure it is. Atheism is defined by being *not* theism. As moonflower points out the word opposite only applies colloquially in most cases, including color, but there certainly is a dichotomy involved when one thing is *defined* by being the absence  of another.
When my wife was pregnant, she felt that she was no longer beautiful / sexy to me.  I bought her some things like this for mother's day.
...unless you regularly have your pants stolen
Yes you are 100% correct.  [Here is the counter argument](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=8AyVh1_vWYQ) that crushes me.  Please forgive me actually knowing what I'm talking about.
Firefox
pogs and jacksticks
Are their assholes airbrushed?
how is my source any less valid than yours...isn't it a good thing to read a story from multiple points of view ?
I really meant to write a more thoughtful response, you do bring up some interesting topics. As to why the "Fox and Paki media" gets a bigger upvote is unclear at the moment as there has been an intense online campaign to promote Israel's position and that will skew the numbers.  That being said you have touched on things that  people write dissertations on. 
I think I know the post the OP is referring to. I was in a discussion with a couple guys on Men's Rights page and they were discussing how feminism is based off of misandry, hate and resentment. I was trying to explain about how it is about gender equality but to no real avail. There are extremists on all ends but they were upset at which the grounds "most feminist groups" base themselves off of. It was kind of a disconcerting discussion because one of them stated that they did not consider gender roles (or even the whole of women's history it seemed like) as oppression. It was just discouraging to see such a negative few on simply the idea of feminism and that some how if you support one, you are against the other. 
Can anyone explain [#14](http://www.kylecassidy.com/warpaint/14.html): he wanted a Marines tattoo, but "My memories of Vietnam are not good. I'd rather not think about it."  Why would you want a tattoo about something you want to forget?
Yup... 
I wanted to add that [this is a much better version of that picture](http://image.skins.be/2034651/dyn003-original-800-557-pjpeg-22826-ae8e59989ed4dd/). The picture posted above has had all the fine details washed out. 
NICE FIND :P
Thanks Kylde. 
I don't have a problem with any of those titles, check the ones Krishna linked.
&gt; Don't get put on anti-depressants or try anything stupid.  That isn't necessarily a stupid idea at all. Of course, not everyone needs (or feels that they need) medication in a situation like this, but it's certainly a legitimate and potentially helpful option.
I don't give a shit about these people.
being raped by a worm
Turkey?? http://news.bbc.co.uk/2/hi/world/middle_east/10199824.stm ("Turkey calls Israel a 'terrorist' over Gaza ship deaths")
How does one repair something like this?  Can it even be repaired?
This is not true everywhere you go. I've lived in several states and driven through many more, and almost all the places I've been use mile markers to determine an exit's number. However, New York likes to be different. The exits are sequential. Exit 7 may be 5 miles from exit 8.
Sure, neither would (without tunning the gear ratios anyway), but the veryron would be a lot slower than its top speed compared to the gt-r.  For example(I hope ths doesn't start a flame), a McLaren F-1 is faster than the veyron in the first seconds (in spite of the veryron being 4wd, must be the weight), up to when the cars are going at 200mph or so. That small difference is a big advantage when comming out of a corner. Also, the Veyron is a HEAVY car (the gt-r is too. But it's still like 10% lighter), that would mean you'd have to take corners a lot more slowly than, I dunno, a Ford rs200 or a Caterhman Super 7.
Dear world, please stop saying 'a software'.
&gt; wtf is wrong with me???  You're as much of a knuckle-dragging moron as mtlfan is.
Friends with a (decent looking) girl.
True, mine too, normal SWAT team won't do, this calls for full on IDF attack.
um, where were you 4 years ago?
If you had the right disk you didn't actually need to install the software.
They could, you know, drink water instead.
Most people certainly have more reason to own a camcorder than a tv capture card.
I didn't even know this website existed before this. You fucker.
What is the biggest "OH SHIT!" moment you've been involved in where something went awry or horribly wrong?  Something like [this maybe?](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=bStCcEiOUEw)
No, you're being pompous. You may be correct in traditional english grammar but language is continuing to evolve and the way it is used is subject simply to the user. In this case meaning is still being conveyed with ease. Also you're the only person who is being stringent with their grammar, your assumption of saranowitz is simply conjecture.
For some reason, I believe you
I think that's with birds, maybe. I did a quick search and this [website](http://www.rabbit.org/faq/sections/orphan.html) said it's ok to pick them up but to put them back in their nest. 
They all have a copy of "Under Siege" under their pillows :-)
Just because their family is there now doesn't mean it always was.
&gt;  Bin Laden wasn't making specific threats... Yes he was. &gt; or even telling anyone what they should be doing. And yes he was. And the boats were in international waters.. but even had they been near Gaza it still would not have been "near their port". Had they been "near an Isreali port", with no hostile intent it still does not justify this response. It's true what you say though, Israel threatened to do something illegal and violent, in effect they threatened to commit an act of war, and they did it. The fact that people were warned means they were aware there was risk. But that's still not different from my example.
Alas not, I know her husband Greg as well. They live in Wallingford and stop in at the Grizzled Wizard and Moon Temple and that's how I met them. They've been together for years. He plays sax in the band Goat, so you have to be at least that cool to have a shot with his wife. He'll appreciate the compliment though and I'll be happy to pass it along. "Hey Greg, the internet wants to fuck your wife". This would come as absolutely no surprise to anyone with even the vaguest familiarity with the internet.
Make it Cheetos, to be true to the nuclear metaphor. 
No.
Made in the USA.
Jews and their guilt...  How far will they take it?  Yeesh.
In addition to that recent video that proved that it's acceptable to jizz in your pants.
the problem being that the sites who *do* give out your email are the ones who might not allow this '+' "standard"
Wholeheartedly agreed. *And the Band Played On* was life-changing for me, and his *Conduct Unbecoming* is in my summer book queue.
Haha. I found that to be pretty damn funny. The pic of that kid couldn't be better. 
Sadly enough, from middle-school onward we're taught that academia IS a competition.
I'm inclined to, agree, Mr. Shatner.
You don't have to encourage under age drinking and illegal drug use, its a significant issue with teenagers and young adults, so wouldn't it be better to confront and discuss these issues in terms of harm reduction than simply deny information? Take a poll on how many teenagers use drugs and drink regularly and you'll realise that harm reduction and education is equally important.
A plus sign is valid in an e-mail?
Apparently you need some English lessons. Let's begin:  &gt;**Peace Activist:** A peace activist is a political activist who advocates for a peaceful resolution of political disputes.  &gt;**Pacifism:** The doctrine that disputes (especially between countries) should be settled without recourse to violence; The active opposition to such violence, especially the refusal to take part in military action.  &gt;**Peaceful:** not disturbed by strife or turmoil or war; "a peaceful nation"; "peaceful times"; "a far from peaceful Christmas"; "peaceful sleep" See Also: **Passive:** peacefully resistant in response to injustice; "passive resistance"   See, these words are not synonyms. Oh, wait, I don't want to confuse you.  &gt;**Synonyms:** two words that can be interchanged in a context are said to be synonymous relative to that context.
Maybe they should add a lottery to the tax system. Some random tax payer gets a million.
making fun of a magazine ad for objectifying a woman BY objectifying a woman doesn't make much of a statement, commenters...
poor little guy didnt even see it coming.
Why don't you just get a tap at your place and develop a secret knock?
http://images4.wikia.nocookie.net/__cb20080918103239/lostpedia/images/8/8c/Jackface.jpg
I havn't sat down with it to really test the battery life.  Usually what I'll do is to take it, load a paper or a website, and go relax on a couch somewhere.  But when they say 6 hours of battery life while watching a movie, i believe it.  I got a keyboard to connect with it, and it is a Logitech Internet 350 keyboard.  Lots of people have had success connecting keyboards to it but I'm just giving you an update on the keyboard situation.
Increase weight on your dead-lift and reduce sets (I usually do 1 warm-up, 1 heavy after 5 set squat myself).  After 5x5 on squats I'm usually way too fried to do 25 dead-lifts.  I think in SS they have you do either bench or press which if you really want to cut your gym time you could do the same and alternate each lift day.  Depending on your goal you may or may not be down with that.  For reference my split (bastardized SS):  + 3x5 Sq (1x135, 1xheavy-20, 3xheavy)  + 1x5 DL (1x135, 1xheavy)  + 3x5 Bench (1x135, 1x155, 3xheavy)  + 3xF Pull-ups (~25)  + Ab work (assorted planks/crunches etc)  Rest time between warm-ups and first heavy lift is the amount of time to change weight.  Rest time between heavy sets 2 minutes.  Ab work ~10min.  The last few workouts I've clocked 45-50 minutes total.
i clicked on the stupid advertisement during the bonus round
if i win i get flowers, my laundry done, or a massage; if he wins he gets a blowjob
Grind
I like Macbook Wheel better. It's satire but it's just a little TOO accurate. 
Good for you man, anyone who yells insults at someone excersizing is a loser. Keep up the good work.
Coraline, too.
Some bold adventurers (me) realize this and go anyways.
The past, too.
When you sit in one spot constantly planting claymores and watching one doorway in prone... that is camping
Yea, I was really saying that all regimes justify their acts. Whether they are considered evil or not. 
There is indeed intrinsic power in numbers. That's why polycentric law would work a lot better than the corrupt, unilateral, violently enforced one-size-fits-all law today. I'm not suggesting that there be nothing backing up the authority of laws. There are other ways to enforce rules that are generally agreed upon in a society than erecting an unaccountable monopoly of violence and threatening people with it--like social or commercial ostracism. The "power in numbers" truism extends to support this. In a voluntary law system, when one commits a  crime and flees or avoids restitution, you could simply alert everyone in society about them so nobody would conduct commerce with them--in a modern society where no man is an island, that basically means exile to the wilderness or voluntary starvation.  Saying that corporations would still exist, just under a different name, doesn't make it so. The corporations of the modern world derive their power and unaccountability *directly* from the state, and not in spite of it. If you remove the gun in the room that is the state, suddenly everyone has to negotiate with each other instead of fighting over control of the gun. If you mean to suggest that in the absence of national states corporations would just hire soldiers and become states in their own, I would contest this on the grounds that when you have state-based military and police, their astronomical costs are paid for by the taxes extracted from the very people being oppressed. Large businesses simply could not afford to do this on their own balance sheets, and if they tried their customer and investment bases would evaporate overnight.
I'm not sure what you mean by "act illegally" - boarding a ship that has declared its intention to violate a blockade is legal under section 67 of the [San Remo Manual on International Law Applicable to Armed Conflicts at Sea, 12 June 1994](http://www.icrc.org/ihl.nsf/FULL/560?OpenDocument), and the activists certainly didn't expect Israel to let them through. I agree with you though, I certainly didn't expect it to turn violent, and apparently the IDF didn't either - if they expected violence they probably wouldn't have rappelled one at a time into an angry crowd armed with paintball guns and holstered sidearms. Tactically the IDF was extremely ill-prepared for this operation.
Finding a half a worm in your apple...
I can't compare a hot liquid you can get at a restaurant and transport or consume in  a car with another  hot liquid you can get at a restaurant and transport or consume in a car?
King of Carrot Flowers
Global Warming!!!
&gt;without buying additional hardware?  *ahem*
OK, i got it you took the joke, literarilly. Maybe she was piloting the chopper.
A wild Duke appears! "Eat shit and die."
fucking gooks and their shitty gook games. pokemon is for faggot middleschool outcasts
It's even better: The german constitution/grundgesetz does not permit wars at all except defensive wars on german territory.  The only thing that makes participating in this war *legal* here is that we stopped calling it war.   Now it's called something like "peacekeeping mission with war-like circumstances" (paraphrased, but really, I'm not kidding!).
That's just a nickname one of my friend's gave me when we were little, since my name is Dee and it sounds like teabag, It seemed smart at the time haha! Although douchebag and dbag or whatever aren't a turn of phrase over here so it didn't click when I registered either.
Yes, there is angry ranting but you seem to have missed where Randi addresses your concerns. Randi suggests he is drinking the bath water and fasting.  He also suggests the guy knows he will not be able to pull this off under more rigorous scrutiny which is why he hasn't tried to claim the 1 million dollar prize.  
The US Constitution Bath Tissue © : Wipe away those old smelly civil liberties and get repressed!
Oh, for fucks sakes. You're censoring posts because of these pro-Israel schills need to remove the negative publicity surrounding the events. Do they complain when the posts editorialize things they do not care about? FUCK NO! They are envoking the 'play by the rules card' to censor, plain and simple.   You're a moron admin, btw. Thanks for not representing the interests of the majority of Reddit users.
Don't marry that second one.
Well the woman who was raped in haiti blamed white society.
Let the circlejerk commence.  Thing is, if you were living there, if it was your family that was put in danger, you'd be thinking very differently. I'm not saying every action taken by the IDF is justified; far from it. However, it's not as simple as it seems from the outside.
[John Weathers is the industry leader in drumming facial expressions](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=UWfmfgHXAfE#t=1m16sec).
That's a pretty simple way of looking at things.
I've never heard Ayn Rand referred to as "Nietzsche for stupid people" before; that's hilarious.
I prefer my women thin, but I would make an exception for you. You are quite beautiful.   :)
Shockingly, The Onion nails it again.  Who else is more consistent?
I want to punch that bitch in the throat.
Yes--PM me for my email.  My advice: Just ask, good job. No seriously. I've been published all over the place and sometimes its simply as easy as emailing an editor and saying, "What are you short on this month?" or "How can I fill some space?"  **Work history:** The magazine I'm editor-in-chief of now, used to be the one I worked at in high school. I was their first writer on staff back then, and when my editor decided she couldn't handle it anymore, she sold the business to me. I work freelance as a copywriter and social media consultant. I've been published in a couple of major newspapers/magazines doing book reviews/ features.   I started publishing when I was 14, so my most useful advice would be to start young, because it takes a couple of years to get from point A to point B.
They absolutely are tools for doing it. I am not arguing that. In fact I thank they are complete fucking d-bags for doing it.  ** cough * Diaspora * cough **
I wonder when this video was made. At least half the players they called out by name won't be participating. :(
Incredible, 51 years old and still so able-bodied to rape.  Such sin must be so pleasurable indeed... Don't look at me that way.   Or maybe he just had pills, I don't know, I'm not a doctor.
Meaningful something? Porn is porn, but she doesn't really do it for me most of the time.
&gt; inept\_grammer\_nazi
[](/wat) [](/beh) [](/beh) [](/beh) 
Although this is not what the OP wanted I feel it is only fair to mention the grittier side of the language as well. I have to say I love hearing the absolute filth that comes out of some people's mouths here whether they are young or old, male or female.  Where I live people just pepper their sentences with the B word all the time. You see it in SMS's they just write it as a letter 什么什么你妈B 什么什么. You even hear old people on the bus coming out with it. Here 妈B is pronounced MaPss and you go to the local snooker club and they just love saying it.   Notable occurrence was in a  taxi once when another taxi cut us up and the taxi-driver, with a very good natured grin on his face, shouted "Ni Ma Mair Ta Le ge B" which would translate as into mandarin as 你妈卖她的屄.  OK I'm going to hell for laughing at that one.  The other thing I love is local dialects.  Where I live the dialect is pretty strong and has a very earthy quality. For example approximate pronunciations  回家=gaki (actually this is 回家去 with the 回 dropped ki=去 as in  我吃不下去了=chi b' ha ki le) 今天=geige 明天=meige 后天～herge. “sh” sounds get converted to "s" or "er"  so 88 is pronounced ba-er-ba 什么时候～sen me si hou. 啤酒is pronounced ~Pssjiu, I could go on forever. I was once in my company and happened to be explaining how to say the "z" in Azure. The boss turned to a colleague and happily said oh that's just like 衣服的衣. I was thinking "yes just exactly like that"  The scariest time was when I realized I could pretty much understand it all.
It's plastered all over the front page.
A McMenamin's brown ale, tasty and clean, made perfect by having it with two nice ladies at the [Lighthouse Pub](http://www.mcmenamins.com/279-lighthouse-brewpub-home) while sorting newly found agates.
Hey, as a jew who does not support Israel actions, I ask that you be more careful about the terms you use. It breaks my heart to have this be something "the jews" did. The Israelis did this and the distinction needs to be made.
Wish the organist practised a bit more. Their interpretation of the theme was sub-par :(
...like ice cream!
Wanting freedom of expression in facebook makes as much sense as wanting freedom of expression at max Zuckberg's home.
I've used 3G on a 300km/h train!  It was a bit laggy and the connection tended to drop in tunnels, but it was certainly good enough for IRC and reddit and the like.
Dang! I freakin' love the Rugrats...and All Grown Up. 
&gt; In the case of students it would destroy their lives by robbing them of years of education.  Actually make a case that students will be systematically deprived in a way exceeding that of our public schools. Otherwise all you have is proof by assertion and proof by repetition.  &gt; Yes. Why else would they fail.  This answer leaves me dumbfounded. Can anyone possibly reasonably answer 'yes' to this? There are all sorts of reasons why some businesses fail and others succeed, many of them having to do with little other than sheer luck. A business burns down or gets hit by a tornado, the right person just so happens to hear about your business plan and not some other perhaps better business plan and invests in you, etc. Besides, with regards to competition, competence is relative. It is altogether possible that 90% of the businesses were competent by some objective standard but got drove out of business by competitors that did an even better job. This could be the case for education, too. The tendency over time for more competent businesses to stay in business and more incompetent ones to go out of business is just that, a tendency over time. It does not make predictions than in any and all particular instances, the more competent business will have greater success.  &gt; If you are selling education yes. If you are selling toasters not so much.  &gt; We ought to forgo them for entire categories of goods and services like education, energy, banking etc.  I would argue almost the opposite. We should look at the success of business providing goods and services that the government has not deemed important enough to bring severely under its control. We have massive government intervention in education, energy, and banking, and we have massive problems in all of those areas. And before you answer that, on the contrary, we must not have enough government control in these areas and that this is the reason for our problems, please do explain, for once, what is so different about these services that freedom and competition cannot work the way it does for less important things like toasters and televisions? Either something is different about these categories of goods and services or we ought to also bring the provision of toasters and televisions under government control, too.
I'm way pro gay, but I have little respect for people who have to keep their lives a secret.  Do you keep it from your girlfriends?  I bet you do.  A real scumbag move, especially when gay sex is so risky.  I said that experts agree that this type of behavior is abuse whereby one child becomes indoctrinated via molestation or porn and gets the others on board.  And you have no way of knowing if that's how it happened because it's unlikely that this would have been disclosed. I don't really give a shit if you're a closet case and have to wax poetic about sex amongst children and jack off every five minutes while you either imagine this scenario out of whole cloth or recollect the glory days, but sex amongst children is irregular and warps people's sexual identities in much the same way that adult on child sex abuse does and your closeted gay lifestyle is living proof.  
Prove me wrong.  and while you're at it, ponder the fact that Egypt is participating in the blockade of Gaza as well.   It's full of criminals and terrorists, you know.   Well actually you don't because you're a demonstrable ignoramus.
WELL ASK ONE OF THE TENANTS THEN, DUMBASS.  ARE YOU REALLY THAT STUPID??  *Help me reddit!! Mean man playing loud music, must be a gangbanger!  And I don't even have enough common sense to think to ask any of the other tenants who the manager is!!* 
A higher price really can be a feature.
Grandpa started in a RCAF Lancaster on delivering supplies over Normandy to the resistance. Eventually he was transferred to another crew.  The plane he was in before was shot down. None of his former crewmates survived.  My other wasn't aloud to serve for medical reasons but did his best to do what he could in the homeland.
i don't think seven words spanning two lines warrants a tldr.
&gt;In the rain is quite cold.  Hi, welcome to Arizona!
Eating disorders have a terrible recovery rate because you have to eat to live. While in recovery for drugs or alcohol, you avoid the people who do them and don't buy them. How do you help someone that will eat a week of groceries in a day, or order 2 pizzas and eat then alone in their room? How do you help someone that only eats 200 calories a day and exercises 3 hours after? You can't without inpatient care, and that doesn't really work either.  It's a seemingly hopeless condition. You have to eat, but when eating is the cause of the disease, what can you do? I can see why funding is so low. "Why bother," especially when it's seen as a disease of young, upper-middle class white girls. 
[Deer Suck (video)](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=xL9xCWphV8s&amp;feature=youtube_gdata)
Humor. 
Changing platforms. Who needs USB when you have services like Dropbox and Evernote?  It fits an in-between phone and laptop market beautifully with great design and a capable OS.  Size matters. If it didn't, nobody would own a minivan 
Thanks for the tough love and good advice. When I feel this way I feel I have little or no options, when I really do. You're entirely right, I need to find a job in my field, and I have been looking. I finally worked up the motivation yesterday night to apply for a ton of things in my field. And I pulled up all the textbooks I needed to refresh myself on stuff I'd forgotten from not programming in a year.
Wow, that looked like alot of thrust from a small gummy bear. Imagine airplanes with drop tanks of liquid gummy bear and gummy bear fuel stations to power gummy bear injected cars. Science, FUCK YEAH!
&gt; It's got something to do with illegally boarding a boat in international waters.  From what I know, the legal considerations of this action are quite delicate, but the few things I still remember about Admiralty law may be a little bit tainted -- there is still a tendency in the German academic discourse to come up with silly excuses for WWI actions -- it may very well be lawful to board a ship to look for contraband in international waters after declaring a blockade.  &gt; Had the Israelis already fired on the boat? Please explain how you know this to be true  I don't know if the flotilla was attacked before the boarding action, but I've explained why I don't think that the Israeli narrative is more convincing then what has been reported from Al'jazeera.
that's just like, your opinion, man.
But 2000 years ago, someone died on that land! And before he died, he told people to stop killing! Obviously it means we should kill more.  Also, honest question: why do Christians support a nation of Jews? I was under the impression that Christians believe that the Jews killed Jesus, and that the anti-christ is actually just the Jewish messiah. Is my understanding mistaken, or what's going on here?
Who knows.  People are strange these days.  Anyway, hows your sex life?
Let's see. I just draw up my emoticon drawing of Muhammed with arms raised:  O-]-&lt;  Let's see if I get deleted now.
Thanks, heres hoping I get that interview. I wrote a banging cover letter which I had two people proof read and am totally qualified for the job. I hope I get a call cause I can't wait to get out of construction!
How did Italy get pulled into this?
That would violate causality.
Their demographic is douchebags who spend money on a subscription to a shitty print magazine.  No offense, but I'm sure you understand now that you've seen it for yourself.
For some reason I was thinking I would scroll down and read that he bought them a house.  Definitely not expected of him, but it's sad to think of that kid's predicament.
No man, these are either yankees or people that migrated here from other countries. People up there flee to the south for jobs, not the other way around.
We controlled the other 3. The leak is beyond our control and expends a lot of energy. Not easy to stop something so powerful. Its like trying to stop a flood or tsunami after it happened. Given enough time we can do it, but its not easy. 
Huh?  Mine doesn't do that :(
mines kind of silly, but i've wanted to be pinned to a wall, especially if it was with alot of people in the next room or something, but thats just me.
In his belly, you will find a new definition of pain and suffering as you are slowly digested over a thousand years.
I think it was Gandhi that most effectively used martyrdom against an oppressive regime. However, it doesn't work so well against a regime who are actively trying to exterminate you. Peaceful Palestinian protests usually end up with dead Palestinians and nobody caring.
I'm just saying that it's the Israelis making the rules on this one, not the American government.   Jeez, people, thanks for the downvotes... reflexive much? 
North Korea is China's ugly kid, but Israel own the U.S
YEAH!   politicians have more responsibility.
Stormfront is awesome. Everyone should play this video game.
&gt; Most legal "tips" on Reddit are going to apply to adults.  Most legal tips work under only at best 75% of situations.  Doesn't apply in airports.  Doesn't apply in prison.  Doesn't apply in foreign soil.  Doesn't apply in a crowded bus.  Doesn't apply within 100 ft of the President of the United States.  There is a reason why the acronym "IANAL" exists.  I'm just shocked that a kid that is supposed to be honors-level smart thought "I heard on some anonymous unverified website that I could do this, so I will" rather than thinking about what he read and then did some independent thinking and research of his own.  
Seriously. If you are not on a personal basis with the man, leave him alone. 
I got into them not to long ago, can solve a 3x3x3 in under a minute, intuitive f2l, 2 look oll and pll.  Keeps your hands busy once you know what you're doing.
By "correctly," do you mean the way you were taught, or perhaps your preference? Because it's pretty silly to think something's right just because you were told it is, or because you prefer it.  There's no noticeable performance impact in using LShift for left-hand keys, so I'd like to see some citation for evidence of this "correct" usage of the shift keys.
I sense much fear in them.
Good summary, a bit biased given your novelty account.
you are not the owner of the copyrighted material (unless you are fox corporation). you are not a media company using copyrighted material in editorial content (cnn using clips in a news show). this is not parody (snl making fun of american idol). you are not using this in a nonprofit educational manner (showing movies in a class about movies).  start here: http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Fair_use  continue here: http://www.copyright.gov/fls/fl102.html  the closest you are going to get is this part:  &gt;# the effect of the use upon the potential market for or value of the copyrighted work.  as you may not be marketing simpsons brand flammable robot dolls, but you fail the other tests.  as far as you getting paid for it, doesn't matter. you are in violation. fair use does not mean "do what ever the hell you want". as a professional graphic designer who works with rights managed stock and copyrighted material all day long, i think that i know a bit more about rights than an amateur.  but all in all, good luck. worst that can happen is a C&amp;D letter, unless you want to fight it. and you will be crushed if you do.  also, as noted by others, its a pretty shitty 404 page. and if this [competing author](http://www.reddit.com/r/funny/comments/c9uq9/i_had_to_make_a_404_page_for_a_client_heres_what/c0r4x5h) finds out how substantially your ripped off his site, that's another C&amp;D letter at the least.
... grr
.....using a spork?
Unlike Israel, which has super-duper weapons systems to lob their bombs onto civilian targets. 
Park Sang Hak, an activist and *former* defector from North Korea...  It's a trap!
I really don't know what to say in response to that.
Fat fucking chance.
I wish Bruce had wooped up on him in real life. Chuck Norris is a shit head.
Ah yes, because as we all know, e cannot equal mc**2 because proportionality is a &gt;distorted view of reality.
So if you're Hippocrates and you use powdered willow bark because you think it has magical properties and it relieves your pain then you're a fraud but if you use aspirin because it relieves your pain then you're fine.
I'm not a fan of dichotomies anyway. It's just made out to be that way in discussions (like the two examples I gave). Omnitheism has no real meaning whatsoever, since there are no omnitheists. More than anything this is meant to shift the conflict of atheism and theism away from a dichotomy.
you can't make these - it's a YouTube hoax.
Does anyone know of an softwares that can create this?
I can order pizza with a mere touch of a button.  Let's see an ant do that.
Perhaps we should post a mirror declaration on Men's Rights :  &gt; This is not a place for : &gt; &gt; * Misandrists, &gt; * those who believe men have oppressed women for 10,000 years, and still do, &gt; * those who equate MRM with hating women, and &gt; * those who post hate or disrespect.  That might lighten the load of feminists coming to troll here. BTW, are they many MRAs in r/feminisms? Not so many, heh? Figures.
Or just swim in the gulf!
&gt;If you don't need to eat or drink, you don't need to break either  break?  
On a bike or on foot?
it is illegal. it is internationally recognized as illegal. and no matter what spin you put on it, it is wrong. that is all.
First it was trends and now it's single events. Your argument is all over the place. 
whaaat? fast food conspiracy to bring about world peace?!! never heard of it, please elaborate! 
You don't have to stare back, you know. Rise above such puerile nonsense - or you're really no better than they are.
They [both](http://www.urbandictionary.com/define.php?term=spoof) [show](http://www.urbandictionary.com/define.php?term=sploof) up on Urban dictionary too.  What the fuck kind of word is sploof?  "Spoof" genuinely makes sense, as you are covering up the smell with something else.
Just have to delete the [present one](http://www.reddit.com/r/todayilearned/comments/c9yer/til_the_state_of_maine_keeps_most_of_its_money_in/) to be able to submit the new one.
Nice, thanks.
&gt; Most vegans I know are also more "evangelical" than most Christians, and will try to convince me that, eventually, everyone will see things their way.  The problem is, I'm convinced that your choice to eat meat is horribly wrong. I don't want to be evangelical, and mostly I'm not, but I might be tempted because I hope you might stop using animals.  Incidentally, I suspect that people will not see things my way; that humanity will persist in this way for centuries, if not millenia. Yet one must hope.
Wow!!! That's truly incredible. I like the anecdote of tying up the pants. How many were in your camp? Everyone was okay I presume?
Sure thing. If you can think of something you like, a trade school may be more to your liking (based on your 2.0 GPA). Trade schools teach you how to actually do something, like say a mechanic, or an XRay Tech. They are usually much shorter in duration and I would assume cheaper (I don't know the costs). 
because having me just stand there knocking on the speaker is more safe?
How come at the end of the one Ke$ha song she says, "I like your beard"?
Juice is $2 and soft drinks are $1.25 in my building.
Having been a psych patient for ten years I can tell you this: don't stick too close to the DSM.  A whole lot of mentally ill people have something that doesn't fit into any of the categories described therein.  Stick to treating symptoms and don't try and categorize people who don't fit into one of the predefined slots.   
Well, that would have been irrelevant if Dana hadn't alienated Fedor the first time wouldn't it?
Well its not like you dont know what to do right, just keep doing it and try to make it faster/better with time =)
There are so many shit touchscreen tablets to choose from that run Windows. I stopped even considering tablet computers because they have sucked so hard.  Stores don't even bother putting out demo models anymore. That really says something.
you should still use and oil-free moisturizer. breakouts generally happen because face wash removes the natural oils from your skin.
There is an easy way to avoid that.
I was all ready to deride you for having such a violent response to something  &gt;makes me want to find the nearest living thing and kill it.   Then I realized it was Teen Hearts and now I understand.  God speed young prince.  
If you can afford it, a good midi sequencer is the way to go, they usually will be able to spit out charts as well. I use Digital Performer.
http://tawfiles.blogspot.com/2010/05/doctor-and-pierced-nun-met-in-forest.html
Right now the top of the pipe is bent over and crimped like a hose. They are cutting off the pipe right under the crimp so that they may then try to put a device on the regular sized pipe opening.
I'm going to have to say China
do you still need it?
you're quick.
No
Are you going to answer any questions?
lol just noticed your name. where you from fella? i'm in san jose.
Damn it! He even has an argument against lesbianism? 
prick. i've never seen that film and had no immediate plans to, but it was on the list of films for a night in. i had no idea someone dies until you just dropped that. thanks. thanks.
You just objected to film in general.  Sorry that "Scott Pilgrim vs. The World" is going to be a movie, I guess?
And what issue do you have with us ?  Why is it so wrong of us to want to live openly as who we are ?  We don't complain when you push your heterosexuality in our faces.
Don't be antisemitic, shoot them.
I think my older brother had this when we were little! ...It used to scare me. I guess I thought it meant that it was poisonous.
I don't presume to know their motives, and maybe they were going to beat him half to death and the wire saved his life. But I think you'd be hard pressed to find a democratic country outside the States* where trespassing gives you the right to murder someone. I mean if I rigged up my front garden with home-made landmines I'd probably get in trouble if someone blew off a leg no matter how well signed the minefield was.  I mean manslaughter's a bit extreme, but I wouldn't say he was definitely railroaded based on the few facts about the case you've shared.  *I'm not assuming you're an American
That guy's not a dentist. He's a gay porn star.
were you nearby?
We have 2, one is Weta's and the other is used by NIWA.
... You have to wear clothes ...
Thanks everyone for your thoughts. I've actually tried your #1, Literati. I made some joke about filling a USB stick with porn (uh, long story), and the girl _freaked_ out. Actually, in retrospect, the whole thing was kind of funny. She turned out to be a pretty devoutly religious person. But that whole thing was my fail, because it was in a quasi-professional venue and not a bar or something like that. With regard to your #2, that's another problem I have. I speak really really fast to try to cover up my nerves.  I'll keep both of these in mind.
Yes, this is good!
It was fall.  I was wearing a faux-[shearling coat](http://www.google.com/images?hl=en&amp;gbv=2&amp;tbs=isch%3A1&amp;sa=1&amp;q=shearling+coat&amp;aq=f&amp;aqi=&amp;aql=&amp;oq=&amp;gs_rfai=).  I was at a crosswalk, and at the traffic lights some guy yelled "FUR IS DEATH!".  I yelled back "It's fake death, you idiot!"  
I find bugs in the process documenting my code,  so I tend to agree with the headline. I'm not sure that documentation is **the** key to better software,  although it certainly tends to be one of the biggest problem spots.
agreed. I used to love watching fox boston every morning/night but recently, every other story is about a celebrity or american idol. The nightly news has gotten so depressing lately too. Watching it makes me feel uneasy inside now. 
Great clip brotha, but seriously, why the hell were you and your wife's head cut off? Maybe a friend did your videography, which is ok, but i'd be pretty upset if you paid for it.
No. 
Is that inventory complete, or is there more?
Yea, fuck you you pro-Israeli propagandist schill. Read this asshats apologists posts.   *puts on monocle* "Oh, I do believe these posts go beyond the gentlemanly rules of conduct."  Why don't you admit you want to see these posts censored? 
&gt;Drive Thru  /sigh
Yes, yes, you are.  As for the google search, no shit.  Try googling "Heidi doctor" and you'll get over 2,650,000 results--good God, what could this possibly mean?!???!  While I remain sympathetic to your situation, circumstance aside, you're clearly not the sharpest tack of the bunch.
Are you sure he wasn't joking with his first comment about nose blowing? I've had it happen before that I was just trying to gently tease a girl and she got frustrated thinking I was legitimately mad. Your comment "geez I can't help it, sorry" sounds like it might have been said with sarcasm, which could definitely annoy someone.  This sounds very much to me like it could be just a big misunderstanding of people's tones.
It's too bad iIdi Amin missed this fucking guy. 
I painted my Model M into a Das
Why would they cannibalize the successful iPad launch? I give this 1000:1 odds.
I agree I think the ships where sent to provoc  and the Israelis gave them what they wanted
True that. The group is called "Marijuana Prohibitors rallying for my brother" now. And there are FOUR members. Wooo.
shit, they made a second?
Case in point: Christianity, the beginning of.
Well, you just might have the most awesome name ever.
THE MIGHTY CTHULHU HAS FOUND A NEW WAY INTO THIS WORLD!!!!!
That seems like more of a pro to me. If people vote for a so called fringe party, they deserve to be elected.
@_@
My girlfriend always yells "GET A JOB!" to people on the street who look like they probably have jobs. She also sarcastically cat-calls construction workers. Some get offended.
You don't have a particularly small penis.  It's close to average.  Don't take porn as evidence of what's normal, and remember that the advantage of not having a porn star penis is it makes both oral and anal much, much easier.  Even if you find someone who really likes to feel filled up, remember that your fist will always be big enough.  Both your questions - about dick size and stamina - seem to imply that you are concerned about pleasing your partner.  So go for oral and other kinds of play first, make them come, ask them what they like, etc., before you get to the penetration.  
Preparing for downvote...  Because it's obviously OK to kill Jews with rockets.  Right?  Yeah, go to hell.
Well Torterra's not exactly best suited for that role.  He has high HP, Atk, and Def, but his SpAtk and SDef are lacking.  So don't expect him to get much use out of Giga Drain or be able to take Special hits.  The thing I really like about Torterra is that he doesn't take Sandstorm damage.  So he's getting the full benefit of his healing moves even when a Sandstorm is going on, which is often.  Venasaur, however, has good HP, high SpAtk and good SDef.  So if you wanted you could definitely teach him Leech Seed, Giga Drain, and even Substitute if you wanted to be a real jerk.  You can breed him to have Ingrain if you really want it, but I don't think it's that worth it if you're already Leech Seeding with Leftovers.  You could also consider Tangrowth.  He's got more HP, Def, Atk, and SpAtk but much less SpDef and he's a little slower, but he also learns all the same moves.  There's also Meganium which is basically the same as Venusaur except less offensive and more defensive.  He gives up some SpAtk for more Def, so Meganium might actually be the one for you.  It learns all the moves you were talking about and has the most well rounded stats.  I would suggest going for a moveset something like this:  Leech Seed, Giga Drain, Aromatherapy, and Grass Whistle (I wish he had Sleep Powder, but that's where Venusaur has him beat).  It's basically purely defensive, so don't expect it to get a ton of kills, but it will be incredibly obnoxious to kill.  You could also substitute either Reflect or Light Screen on Sleep Powder if you feel like.  Or hell, be even more annoying and give it Toxic.
The Nana brotherhood of the Traveling Pantsuit?
&gt;objective, accurate history...  That doesn't exist.
You are very confused.
This is an amazing mod for an amazing game. I recommend anyone interested in an epic open world single player space sandbox, TRY IT!  The modder is very talented and has completed a game that MSGS could not!
Every else got the patriot act 
&gt;Israel does not have any "right to exist" and it's almost a laugh listening to the various liberal "open borders" and "anti-nationalists" turn on a dime when the Zionist regime in Palestine is somehow criticized.  I have literally never seen that happen.  What's funny is watching all the people who claim to support liberal democracy, non-interventionist foreign policy, and anti-racism turn on a dime into foaming-at-the-mouth, imperialist hatemongers bent on American-European domination of the Levant when "the occupation of Palestine by the Zionist regime" is mentioned at all.
Password to lock is broken by connecting to a Linux box. Gives full access to the device.  :-(
I really liked Addiction (Opium Mix) from Remix Dystemper by Skinny Puppy. Other than a few gems, the album is complete shit.
no, you could sue if a car injured you, so they're forced to refuse you
no it's not. you've got good taste assman.
Troll much? http://www.reddit.com/user/DickSuffers
Screw the L4D reference, this is a really intersting page anyway. Good work.
Removed.  Do not link to downloads.
Cecil Adams is much nicer to the MBTI that you are: http://www.straightdope.com/columns/read/2922/does-the-myers-briggs-personality-assessment-really-tell-you-anything
Territorial waters implies Israel's territorial waters. 
 Wouldn't it be horrifying if the world's first artificially intelligent computer evolved from was some business computer? I can smell the mints, booze and sleaze already. 
But dogs wouldn't ever have been trained to sniff out drugs if drugs didn't exist in the first place.  Argue with that logic.
At least it is documented. Thanks to globalization and youtube, in three to four generations they all will be aware of what was really going on in the minds of their past legislators.
yes but I don't actually "know" people on reddit. The thing with facebook is that if some guy I knew in high school works on cars, I can ask him to look at my car easy peesy.   Also... &gt;Nicotine-free  ......*bahahahahahahahahahah*
I make pet beds for small animal rescues myself. I run a shop where people pay for 70% of material costs and shipping and I do the rest. It's mostly "upcycled" or discount fabrics so I can keep things crazy cheap. I find that small animal rescues (cavies, rats, ferrets, etc) receive such little attention that the private rescues are always loving whatever support they get.  High-five fellow shelter-helper :D You got yourself a Facebook fan (you are one of only two pages I am a fan of, so be honored)
I'm game. But not your sybian, it would have to be something clean and mailed right from the store. I'm a germaphobe. And I'll write a couple stories for you about how I'd enjoyed it.  Ah, I've never done anything like this before, but I'm getting a thrill out of the idea, so PM me before I change my mind. :)
I already spent $30 on arbitrary day. What is another $25 for the community.
Well if you can afford, I'm not sure what your budget is, Nikon released an AFS 50mm though it's considerably more than the non-AFS 50mm.  [Here's](http://www.amazon.com/Nikon-2180-AF-S-NIKKOR-50mm/dp/B001GNBLN0/ref=sr_1_2?ie=UTF8&amp;s=photo&amp;qid=1275350695&amp;sr=1-2) Amazon link for it.
What is it with you damn Europeans always shying away from a heart attack?
No wonder the players weren't having a good day, at *the office*.
In this country, tipping is part of the system. Asking if a person needs change saves an extra trip if they don't.
::hug::!
At this point, it sounds like she is obligated to go.  All you can do  is be supportive and listen to her. She must be pretty freaked out right now, and an unconditional friend is what she needs.  Try to see her enlistment as a formative experience, and if truly have a basis for a relationship, it will be there when she comes back. Work within her context.  
I love how decades ago this would have been the popular sentiment.   But after years of activist struggle that has brought the facts about Israel's foreign policy into mainstream consciousness, it's relegated to some troll on a message board named "Ghost of Jenin".
For some reason it's not cool with the Israeli government. Don't ask me why, it's probably something pretty dumb, akin to how I almost got arrested for taking a picture of an old bank building on Montgomery St. in San Francisco. All I'm saying is blaming *our* government for this seemingly odd exception is off-base. 
Perfect, that is awesome, good to have a place where I know I'm on topic. I really appreciate it David. 
The ship was searched at its previous stop in Turkey and was found to have no weapons aboard.  The only weapons there were the ones the Israelis planted so they could keep relief supplies from reaching Gaza.  &gt;  you mount or carry weapons you make your ship a warship.  Every deep sea fishing trip I've been on has had a rifle on the bridge.  Partially for dealing with sharks, partially for dealing with attempted pirates.  I don't buy your claim that this makes them warships and call bullshit on you.
Holy shit!  There is a hole in that city!
They boarded a ship on international water.  On Israeli water.
No mention of Solyaris (the Tarkovsky version) yet?
The smell is more like an acquired taste. Like homosexuality or scotch.
you too can be luke warm http://www.thinkgeek.com/geektoys/plush/bb2e/
Why don't you deep-throat my 18-inch cock, smalldickbigpond?
Amen. These are the real heroes, not people who murder innocent civillians and perpetuate an imperialist agenda for a college loan.
On foot.  I have a back problem that gives me nerve issues in my leg.  Running up hill feels like normal running (which in my opinion is a very good feeling), but running on flat or downhill terrain is painful.  You get some odd looks when you sprint up hills with a murderous look in your eyes.
Not that you probably care anymore, and in case you see this in your inbox, you and I talked about organic vs. non-organic food.  That same night (or the following) after I was involved in this thread I was at a friend's house and we started talking about the organic craze. His wife swears up and down that she's going through some sort of "cleansing," where she's been having diarrhea.  Anyway, he mentions that he too is not totally sold on the taste factor, with the exception of *actual* free-range, farmer's market purchased, organic chicken eggs. He tells me the yolk is a deep orange, the shells are harder, and most importantly they're more delicious.  So yesterday I'm in the mood for eggs. It just so happens there are three left, and whadda ya know: they're farm-fresh blah blah eggs. Purchased from the farmer's market only days before.  First impressions - the shells are indeed very hard, the eggs aren't as uniform as I'm used to, the yolk does appear larger and definitely more of an orange. I also noticed small brown flecks of unidentifiable matter about a centimeter from the yolk. I couldn't pick them out because they were attached by some of the egg white, which is like slime. And as I'm cracking the remaining eggs into the bowl I notice they all have it.  I decided to scramble my eggs [in the fashion of Mr. Gordon Ramsey](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=dU_B3QNu_Ks). Best scramby eggs you'll ever eat. And I gotta tell ya, I noticed zero difference in the taste. Aside from the factors that do not matter to me they were exactly the same as the cheap-ass, chemically treated eggs I've eaten my entire life. Unless I just got a bad batch or something I just don't see that they're worth it.
We're not going to sweep it under the rug or anything. But the way you phrased it made me think of saying, "Well its okay to smoke a bit of pot." Whether I personally believe that or not--its illegal. And I think that's a bit different than the sex issue. I'll happily host an article about recognizing the signs of alcohol poisoning. I probably won't host an article about how to build a bong.
&gt;third-eye [S] 4 points 1 hour ago[-] &gt;That's what I meant too. There are tools that convert pixel graphics to ACSII art or colorized text. 
I'm sure it will someday but if they do video chat you'll have to wait for the hardware to have front facing cameras (which I think I heard the new iPhone will have). Android does a lot for an operating system that's less than 2 years old. 
It was my ten year anniversary last Tuesday.
The truth will set you free, in this case from your post.
And your anti-intellectuality makes you look like an utter tool.
that cant be real.
how... how did I imply that I don't like FFIV?
Wow Curvy, you are stunning! Body shots aside (which are absolutely breath taking) your eyes are hypnotic to me. That is one of the first features I notice, and yours caught me right away. Quickly followed by that beautiful face and body of yours. Wow. I am taken aback.
No, and you're terrible for 1) doing that, and 2) assuming others would be as terrible as you and follow superficial suit.
&gt;We are well aware of Apple's sometimes over the top marketing claims. We also don't care. Go bitch about things that nobody cares about and that don't affect you in the slightest in /r/technology where you can become the top comment.  Oh shit, even *mentioning the rule* gets the fanboys riled up. 
I'm pretty sure thats how everyone sees me when i kill them.
This is correct - it probably was OK until some drunk idiot got hit/hit someone, sued McD's or whoever, won and got big $, thus all fast food joints instituted the policy.
Yep. Too many semi's flashing their headlights at me at night. 
He also rode into town and kicked some money-changer ass.  Don't get into one-upmanship, but don't let people do evil things, either.
....what about infrastructure?  and education?  and social welfare programs?  and municipal projects?  and national parks?  There are a lot of things that need to come before research and foreign aid.
From what specialists have told me, for the same money you can feed your dogs raw food and they will be a lot healthier than with high end kibble.
Stamina and armour are the only 2 stats that have 0 rng involved. Avoidance can fail and when it does it will result in a tank death unless they have the health to take multiple sustained blows.  Your tanking easy runs where the healer could keep you alive if every hit landed. If your after mitigation armour is your god.
Do these need to be in black &amp; white? Is there some reason they can't be more complex, color images?
Is your friend insane? Snorlaxes are sexy as hell.
Or perhaps they weren't trying to create PR, but just genuinely wanted to help the people of the Gaza strip?
Fuckin. A.
Fruitbooter!
I don't even wear pants
If you're in an arranged team, you tend to get less leavers than playing solo-queue.  Personally, I get a leaver every once in a while, with a slight rise fairly recently. Maybe I'm just imagining it, but people didn't leave as often not too long ago.
1) Gaza was an Egyptian territory before it is a territory of Israel's. Until something else happens, the are surrounding it is either Egyptian waters or Israeli waters. It's kind of funny, as if Israel didn't win Gaza in the war with Egypt, Gaza would remain under Egyptian rule and no one would ever care.  2) I didn't realize it was in international waters beforehand. I asked about it later, but that got some down votes too. Ahh, reddit.
My favorite was when she found the guy sitting in his office after dark.  "Do you have syphilis?"  "I told you, it's a hernia."  "It's possible to have two things."
Are you married to your sister?
You know there were thousands of influential white or should I say, non-African Americans, that were part of the culture of jazz and new Orleans music.   I don't like it when we have to have a African-American music month. music transcends culture, and labels, and doing shit like this just cheapens it.
I see where you're coming from. For the sake of a title, perhaps a more readable quote should have been selected from the article so as to build interest, rather than push people away because of cryptic language. Cost would have been a reasonable substitute, though it doesn't carry the same force, and it would be strange to alter the quote just for the sake of making it the link title.   At the same time, we're in the philosophy subreddit, which frequently deals with very complex material, and is presumably directed at a somewhat scholarly audience. Also, since the article itself is somewhat technical, it's hard to imagine that people who take issue or aren't familiar with the technical language will have an abiding interest in it. So, though I agree one should try to make some material as approachable as possible in its titling, I don't know if that's really applicable here. 
you mean Us+Israel vs Turkey+Nato+3-5 arab nations
I know *exactly* what you mean..
Exactly.  I took the ones that percolated to the top.  You just proved that reddit's user filter is working.   Q.E.friggin' D.
Artest is a liability. He's inconsistent he's not that great a defender still makes poor choices etc. The Celtics are playing the best they've played all season etc etc etc.   Lakers do outsize them but rondo Allen Wallace can easily out manuever and outscore them
"... EVEN redditors." Pfft.  2) If you really think science can save us from 'irrational emotional investment'-based beliefs, then you have to admit the 'wrongness' of causing suffering is axiomatic. You believe it - you didn't arrive at it through science or logic. Science has nothing to say about ethics.  3c) I think you've got a pretty high opinion of our understanding and competence. We cannae even plug an oil pipe.  4) Cobblers :)
red rum?
man, dont you read the comments before commenting?
Do tell.
Not really. Israel notified everyone what would happen, was upfront about everything. But the MARTYRS insisted on having a  show down with the IDF. Well they got what they wanted, which was the showdown and the ensuing media storm. Turkey was acting unilaterally and NATO will not side with Turkey. In fact, this may put their membership in NATO to question.
Practice.  Oh, and try this: http://sc2.curse.com/downloads/sc2-maps/details/multitasking-trainer.aspx
Awwwww....somebody needs a hug.  Is somebody a grumpy guss?
Here is a video of a 16-bit adding machine in Minecraft. Its pretty amazing considering the only way it works is because sand falls when the block underneath it is broken. http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=f6JqoE7MZEE
 JACK  Are you real?   CHRISTIAN  I sure hope so. Yeah, I'm real; you're real; everything that's ever happened to   you is real; all those people in the church: they're real, too.   JACK  They're all dead?   CHRISTIAN  Everyone dies sometime, kiddo. Some of them before you, some of them long after you.   JACK  Why are they all here now?   CHRISTIAN  Well there is no now... here.    JACK  Where are we, Dad?   CHRISTIAN  Well, this is a place that you all made together so that you could find one-another.  The most important part of your life, was the time that you spent with these people  --that's why all of you all here. Nobody does it alone, Jack. You needed all of them,   and they needed you.   JACK  For what?   CHRISTIAN  To remember. And to let go.  [6x17-18 - The End]
The bags are awfully feminine. Can't anyone come up with anything a little less pussy looking like?
So what?  Good for them. The bigger they build em, the more of our processors they have to buy.  
It's probably because you antagonize them by saying things like  &gt; nobody cares and society will move past you.  Just sayin'.
Swapping insurance information is just an excuse for giving me her number.
&gt;You are implying that the people on the boat are not responsible for attacking the soldiers because they were angry and scared. I'm not sure I agree.  If your ship is boarded in international waters you have every right to defend your ship.   
Why does carabbas charge more than olive garden? Do they make all there  food fresh? 
Not much. 
 Interesting..Those Quebec numbers are something else too.  But would the Libs go for it though?
Best =/= healthy.
Oh yeah well I got accepted to a top 3 grad school. Neener neener! And my dick is huge and I am a millionaire.
the area was called Palestine long before israel came to be (we are talking modern times, put your god book away). The world recognizes the settlements as illegal, only israel (the terrorist organization) does not. When they do claim statehood, will israel get out of its land. probably not. because israel is not interested in peace, well, not until it is done ethnically cleansing the Palestinians. So you can give me technical definitions all day long, but that will not make the illegal settlements legal.
I said *he* doesn't like the Goonies. I guess I don't like the Goonies as much as I used to, I did watch it on DVD last week :)
&gt;Also, why am I getting downvoted?   &gt;Don't do it!   &gt; All in all, I would never ever consider doing this again or advocate it to anyone.     Sounds like more than just "do research" to me.
There isn't even a single current interpretation; even within the Roman Catholic church there are a great many differing views. While I am sympathetic to the point that most Christians (particularly Catholics, who place a heavy emphasis on the Apostolic Tradition than other denominations) aren't literalists, the bewildering array of (often contradictory) apologists makes it extremely difficult to pin down what any given individual actually believes or wants to discuss. From an outsider's perspective it is a set of constantly shifting goalposts. 
One could replace "veganism" with any -ism, and I fear your argument would be just as valid.
LALALALALALALALALA I'M NOT HEARING YOU!
That would be the worst STD ever.
It's clearly not tied. It's loose and dangly. Which is the most common way of tanning topless.
Made this awhile ago for reddit.   http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=74fa36Xgxec  I used to be able to do it in about 40 seconds. 
Right, but what's the purpose of creating the second "base name" if it forwards to your primary mailbox with or without a keyword apended?  The whole point of the Yahoo solution is that the "base name" *does nothing* if it doesn't have a keyword that you've specifically enabled appended to it, e.g. if my Yahoo base name is foo, I can create mailboxes called foo-bar@yahoo.com and foo-baz@yahoo.com, each with its own forwarding rules.  But *foo@yahoo.com* would *not* be a valid address.
I believe he was also allowed "mouth wash" too, which was "very carefully monitored."
It happens with certain subjects. Every time there is an article about privacy in Britain it gets blown out of proportion so much I end up 'on the side' of the thing I don't really like because I can't stand the hyperbole.
If the other member nations failed to defend the country that was attacked, NATO would effectively dissolve.
I don't need clarification, and your analogy fails on the account that the vast, vast majority of people are "anti-rape" and very, very few are vegan. One is an EXTREMELY clear ethical position, the other isn't.  Meanwhile, your view is simply incompatible with the real world. Vegans will always make up a small minority, and thus you should encourage others who won't ever share your views to do what they can.  Let me ask you this: do you not think vegetarians are better than the general populace, then? If not, then you're too overly principled to take seriously, and if so, how am I not just yet another middle ground between vegetarians and the rest of the populace?
&gt;as for your picture i saw a similar one with somebody holding up what looked to be a paintball gun and now that image has been removed.  From the video I think it is clear that that image is of a person on the boat beating a man on the ground. It was certainly concrete enough to be put on the wikipedia page.  Conclusively who had paintball guns and when, remains to be seen.  &gt; not only that but israel is known for its megaphone project which was designed to specifically promote pro-israel views and misinform the public. with this knowledge i disregard pro-israel statements.  It works both ways. Israel isn't the only one hitting the streets trying to promote their point of view.   I only trust in the facts of the situation, or withhold judgment until better evidence is found.   From the facts of this situation, it is clear that both sides reacted violently. It is also clear that neither side really cared about humanitarian goals but would rather force a confrontation.
I don't know, but I can't say I blame her taste.
Interested in being a writing friend? :)
Ron Paul 2012!! No more public schools!!!
I suspect now that you have served in these actions.  I understand you have been given a narrative/debriefing/inculcation.  It is incorrect.  I urge you to rejoin society by rejecting these mistakes. It is OK to make a mistake and learn from it.  But, and oh please please hear this....  the bigger the mistake the more needed the learning. And further, it is not just you.  It is all of us... and there is much hard work to do.
Like...that's far out, maaaaan.
Story says 3 missing... I have a good idea where they are.
"Hey gurl, you ever seen a black dick before?"  "Yeah. It was bigger than yours."
bi, you?
You can communicate with the dead?!  What does my long-dead brother have to say about the time-share in Bocca?  Should I sell it to Cindy?
I think it is worse that this is a photograph of a screen, rather than a screen capture.
Can you tell a little bit more about your daily and weekly workout regiment?  How did you alter your diet? What would you have done differently?
I don't get it.
Thank you very much for putting it so simply! I really appreciate this!   Edit: So I've taken the side off the tower &amp; have found that there is actually an airport card already installed, it is just not responding. I have tried to find all sorts of troubleshooting throughout the day, but nothing has seemed to work. Someone mentioned I might need to get a antenna for the back of the computer?
Provocation? Let's talk about provocation. Perhaps if the Israeli's stopped the blockade then there would be no "provocation" by the activists? So basically the Israeli's provoked the activists to provoke the Israeli's to attack the activists. Does that sound like the same logic you used?
You're doing it wrong. If you want to update firefox then you should install a ppa and do it through the package manager. What you definitely _don't_ do is run firefox as root and have it puke miscellaneous unoptimised files all over your system.  And people wonder why their upgrades don't work...
You lose. "It is wrong" does not make it illegal. It is not wrong, nor is it illegal; it is Israeli land. What is wrong is the Palestinian inability to co-exist with Jews. Your use of hyperbole such as "the terrorist organisation of Israel" reeks of anti-semite, and only serves to indicate that your opinions are marred by bigotry and that you are incapable of participating in logical discussion of this matter.
... then fly them.  Edit: With the downvotes, let me explain myself. The only aircraft that have a range short enough that we can't fly them over the ocean are the small ones used on aircraft carriers. Modern aircraft often have enough fuel to fly halfway around the world, especially with the advent of mid-air refueling. And besides, what use is it having allies all over the world if you can't land at their airfields?  Now, there are a lot of benefits to having carriers. They can serve as mobile command hubs, are a excellent weapon (because of their planes), and have proven their usefulness in war (think WWII Pacific campaign). However, their size and complexity make them large, expensive targets that are damn difficult to replace and are relatively easy to knock out (spam with missiles). If an enemy sinks one carrier, they pretty automatically gain the upper hand if you relied on that one carrier at all. So, as millitary technology improves, we are seeing a shift away from concentrated firepower to long-distance precision weapons. In this, our nuclear submarines are our greatest asset, as well as our aformentioned modern stealth aircraft. There simply isn't a need for aircraft carriers anymore. I think it is highly unlikely we will see another war that will require them, especially with said long-distance weapons.
If you click on the Youtube video, it will take you to the Youtube page of the humanitarian group. It's on their page...so they released it. You should check on that so you can stop looking like a fool.
I've kind of had this happen to me, too. Had way too much to drink one night (first night I ever used a beer bong. They aren't that common here in Australia) and ended up in hospital. Felt like you describe most times I drank for probably a good year after that. I can't really say exactly how it affected me because I didn't drink that often for a while. But it didn't last forever for me. I would say, as well as the physical aspect of your body rejecting it because you poisoned yourself, that it's largely psychological. Give it time and try to drink stuff you enjoy (not beer or carbonated alcohol) in moderation for a while.  Also, drinking is cool. 
Actually no, but keep hating on us virgins if that makes you feel better.
It's only hypocritical if you don't condemn the others too.  Last time I spoke with a religious person in the US, I offhandedly remarked that I always thought - as a European - that US was a sort of productive mix of UK, Germany and Saudi-Arabia. And when they ask to clarify that bit, I point that they are the two places where there are tons of people that take religion so very, very seriously.  They did not seem pleased by the comparison, though theoretically they should be pleased - I just called them devout as hell by their standards.
I don't see the repercussions of Israel using nukes to be as bad as you seem to think. What will not happen is the US will not revoke it's support even if Israel uses nukes.   The corporate and political leaders in this country would give it the exact same spin that we used to justify attacks on Nagasaki and Hiroshima. You forget that many of your moronic countrymen would like to see the Jews in Jerusalem and the "towelheads" (not my word) dead. There are a huge number of people and a huge number of powerful people in the US who actually think Israel is doing the right thing. Israel has gotten away with so much over the years, I don't see why you think this would be any different. They've spied on, attacked, stolen from and bribed the US. They've been committing genocide. All of this has been going on for years. All of that in the aggregate probably equates to more human suffering than a single 20kt nuke, and none of that has made Israel a pariah.  *edit* North Korea would have been attacked if they didn't have nukes. Possessing nukes pretty much assures you that whatever measures the US and its allies take against you will not involve anything other than trade restriction.
I was in the grocery area of a super target last winter and this little boy was driving one of those scooters that are there for people who need them.. no idea why this kid was on one.. but he rides up to me and says "hiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiii...............". He was so distracted that he crashed into a produce stand and broke part of it off. 
I understand how they make it work. I'm interested in how they batched it out.  I wouldn't be very willing to write 1000 CSS rules myself...
&gt;Yeesh, and this is defensiveness.  Well that much should already have been clear without your response.  It should also be fairly obvious that being almost universally told that the music to which I listen is inferior is something that rubs me the wrong way.  Yes, I am being defensive.  Most people would probably respond in much the same way if they had the same background I've had.  So since you didn't respond to anything I wrote (besides stating what should have already been obvious), I take it you're either just looking for a specific response, or don't have an intelligent response to the points I've raised.
Someone does that to me and they get a jab in the eyes.
You are incorrect. Also don't seem very intelligent. 
It would be easier and cheaper to get a countersink bit that fits your 3/8-inch drill. I bought a set of five at a home center and the cost was only about fifteen to twenty dollars (i don't remember exactly.)
[Wilbur Sargunaraj music!](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=EVNIdyutsyA&amp;feature=related)  Edit: make sure to watch the related videos, they're at least as good, if not better.
No, it's understandable. I was responding more to krackbaby. But the vegetarian as a tofu-thumping zealot... I know dozens of vegetarians and vegans and I feel it's just a sour stereotype. I know they're out there, PETA does its best to keep the reputation going strong. But it's like saying everyone who doesn't drink bottled water goes out like an Evangelical missionary to try to strip others of the luxury. And they are smug for caring enough to act differently, those ridiculous noplasticbottletarians. Really you're doing what you can and it's the whole population making that collective that can turn this around.  If you're interested [Mark Bittman](http://www.ted.com/talks/mark_bittman_on_what_s_wrong_with_what_we_eat.html) is usually who I cite that normal people advocate vegetarianism too.
democrats and republicans are different, except where it matters.
ha, I've seen that before, pretty insane
Context: http://www.cnn.com/2010/WORLD/americas/05/31/honduras.storm.emergency/?hpt=T1
Ohhh I'm familiar with Pidgin. It's probably actually already on my computer because I'm using Ubuntu. Thanks
They actually did seriously think about it for a while, but now they prefer the download the iso, use the tool to put it on your flash drive approach. (Yes MS will let you download the ISO)  I mean really... do you need a MS windows 7 branded flash drive? 
Thanks Bob!  A million upvotes for you sir!
My car gets 23 mpgb.
You have *balls of steel*
Upvoted for unashamed truth.
There was this big ol' art contest a while back and one douchebag waited until all the other contestants had unpacked their work, collected the trash and packaging, put it together and tacked a name and some douchebaggery about our disposable society or some crap.  I think he won, and I think the other contestants were pissed about that.
Problem is that all laws and rights regarding conflicts comes from documents meant to regulate internal or international armed conflicts. And might not cover the situation well enough, and as such documents like the Geneva conventions aren't in effect. Had they been Israel would have to treat the population of Gaza differently.  Problem with defining it as an internal armed conflict is that Israel isn't considering Gaza as their territory, and aren't officially occupying it either. The whole conflict is very complicated, and aren't exactly any real precedence here.
If you earned college credit in high school, you could potentially do it in one year. Since you had a low GPA in high school, I would suggest going for two (maybe three) years to get a high college GPA to make yourself marketable to better schools. I cannot stress enough how important your college GPA will be.
&gt;I think he works with Facepunch studios now.  Is that why I'm still waiting on The Underside?
They were the last versions I played. Now I can feel a bit more at ease with it.
&gt;The US won't have much room to criticize China for protecting North Korea without looking like hypocritical idiots.  Thats never stopped them in the past.
What's up with the Anime eyes?
I don't know why everyone is assuming you are a man.  I say try going without masturbation for a while.  If doing so makes you more uncomfortable and unable to deal with things than the occasional masturbation, than go back to that.  We all have flaws, after all.
I like. ✩
someone tell me what is is?
That would be the "odds and ends" he mentioned. I love half-quotes.
I've been playing the PC version of the game for the last 5 days and I've had absolutely no problems at all. Multiplayer was a dream and I've not experienced any lag or glitches what-so-ever.
http://www.merriam-webster.com/dictionary/ubiquitous
Well, it was 7 d/v but now it's six. Maybe there are lots of [vegetarians on this subreddit?](http://www.reddit.com/r/wallpapers/comments/c2mws/beefy_2560x1600/)
Misogyny this, misogyny that, blah blah reddit is sexist, etc. etc. 
You should just have them host their email for their domain through google...
No, I wanted to donate extra Chemistry, Physics and Computer science texts that I had from University and didn't need anymore.  They refused.  Now I will note that my local library doesnt really carry much in the terms of academic texts, but instead is fulled with for dummies books.  
&gt;This argument would be ridiculous if we used race as a distinction instead of species.   You're right.   But we're not.   &gt;It's a question of not placing the lives of animals below humans. What makes us so special as to give us the moral right to treat animals as human property and use them as non-consenting subjects in experiments?  There's no question: we are above most animals in the food chain. We don't make this decision.  The decision is to deviate from this.  I'm not saying that it's ethical to use animals as resources due to nature, but we should be clear that you're the one making the decision here.
fill it with oil, i know a good place to get some
What *is* the proper amount to tip a pizza delivery dude?
I suppose.  I'm American, but have never worked in the restaurant industry.  The question always came off to me as being entitled to a tip, which I strongly disagree with.  I also despise our tipping culture as a whole.
You should probably be celebrating.
This is very unfortunate.  :(  
The blockade is part of an illegal occupation, though.
jkbbf9ub9uub33dub3fibfib3femnckrij4 4r 4if4 f5894 f45f 45fu 4fi45f jkrf mfer,del,x rel cerrj rj g
Just mark it as offensive and let youtube take it down.
I think she was in "Rocket Science" as well.
Plaid gets you lad.  *Priests start wearing plaid.*
the t-shirts are awesome! i bought like 6!!!!
How do you plan to keep from being charged with a felony if you ever happen to use the gun you are carrying?  Which will most likely be to stop a simple robbery.
[grape you in the mouth](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Fqq051BU2MY)
I second this nomination.
This is your body telling you that alcohol is a noxious poison, and doesn't belong in your body at all.
I'd vote for him, in this current situation he seems to be the only one with a clear vision for Canada.
make the owl from peggle the probability teacher. 
bad news, Canada is switching to the plastic style soon (or good news if you are in favor of them)
Nice. I'd love to have free wifi more places. It really should be.  I tried to access the on board wifi on a recent flight. It was quick.... but it would only take me to a page where I could sign up for $7.99 for 4 hours or $15 for the day. That's too much. If it was only like a $1 or $2 and I could hand it to a stewardess... I'd be on it.
I was thinking more like my bath tub..i.e. Tom Hanks in "Splash" circa 1984
Tits looked best at 131 imo.
no, it's a pretty bad show. i stopped watching after the second episode.
Also, when shaping the patties, make the middle a little thinner than the edges. When it cooks, the middle will plump up and make an even patty.
Though it's also important to note that when Israel does commit such awful acts upon other people while calling itself a *Jewish State*, and such an overwhelming majority of the Jewish community doesn't criticize it, it does certainly lead to people being anti-semetic. The only way to fight that anti-semetism is for more of your regular Jews to speak out and criticize Israel.  I specifically think of a scene from *American Radical - The Trials of Norman Finkelstein* after he has given a speech in Lebanon, they speak to a teenage boy who says (and I quote because I just looked) "He gave me a different idea about Jews. Now I know that not all Jews are Zionists. Not all Jews have the same goal: killing the Arabs, among other things. That's the idea he gave me." So if Jews really want to fight anti-semitism, speaking out against the Jewish State of Israel's actions is the way to do it.
C-C-C-COMBO BREAKER!
I can't believe this goes on for over 20 minutes. 
How do you categorize comments in boxes like that?  I want it :&lt;
Holeee fuck.  Holeee fuck.  Srsly. Holeee fuck.
Exactly how do you define a threat....a weapon, entering your private property with out invitation? How about both, then when exactly do you drop the cookies and get something to protect your property and family? 
Little late for that, isn't it?
We should focus on demand for cleanup.  The legal details can be decided later. 
Maybe in America people are too thick with their giant cars and wide roads… it's like Fisher Price First Time Driving.  Problem? [](/troll)
Some 'bi' people are just horny and will fuck anybody. 
Wow dyeing hair can do it? That's one I've never heard.   Maybe you're right about the hormones, they've been a little crazy lately.   It's definitely not bad enough to merit a visit to the doctor, maybe I just have to wait it out. I mostly wonder if it's something to do with changes in age, exiting teenagehood, and if there was some secret I was missing to adult skincare.
I guess I just meant "don't ask me why" in the sense that there's no actual "why"... it was just one of those things. I was Craig, my friend was Jack. We did it at a couple of parties where it was all people we didn't know, I think we thought they were kinda lame or something.
Your right. He was the biggest let down since Jesus Christ.
This story blew more than I anticipate sex and the city 2 will blow
Did you crash? or did they?
Well, I am pretty awesome. At least that's what my mom says. Also, I play a mean kazoo. 
In th OP video you hear them announce the flag before boarding.
&gt;Get back.  Oh get back Get back to where you once belonged~
And the final question: How many hours a night do you sleep? Pro-tips? :)   Thanks for sharing!
&gt;What is today Israel, along with the West Bank and Gaza Strip, should be dissolved, and every inhabitant in any of those places should be given a referendum on what sort of government they want. And the majority vote decides.  This is precisely the kind of situation for which the concept of minority rights exists: the situation in which the ethnic majority will vote to destroy the ethnic minority.
same!
I think you meant unsubstantiated 
Aww.  Sorry for your loss buddy.
The rising trend of anti-intellectualism.
No, sometimes there are just complete assholes running around. THEULTIMATEDOUCHE, for instance. (He gets upvoted for some reason in /r/RelationshipAdvice) I'm sure there's other novelty accounts out there that are just as annoying.
Shai-Hulud.
The ending of the video kind of reminded me of giving a lecture to a kid and telling them if they do something wrong they'll get eaten by a monster. Only in this case "doing something" means allowing homosexuality in the country and "getting eaten by a monster" is turned into eating poop.
How did you break down the objects in a level in terms of Sprites / MovieClips? Or did you do some crazy BitmapData shit?  I guess what I'm really asking is how much was clean fancy smanchy code and how much was "FUCKIT I WANT THIS TO GO OVER HERE NOW"
wat
lol. script kids' steganography
[](/perfect)
This is excellent shitty advice, but may I add, to really drive the point home: Make up an imaginary black *female* friend named Shanaynay and pretend to fuck her.
Oh do be quiet, you're embarrassing yourself.
I think his comment is very back-handed and passive-aggressive, but I found that in his EVO review too. Rather than moving between aspect/talking points, he would continue to drag each of his gripes along the entire article. 
I wonder what it would do to his brand new teeth.
Oh, Onion!  How did you manage to get this one wrong?
I liked Year One :(
This. Anyone?
Wait wait, I'm lost.
Mind if I ask where you're from, and if that's normal usage of the word "home" in your locale?  I have to say I've never heard it used that way before. 
Thanks self-designated keeper of proggit and master of the smoothie!
Israel would not be nuking the Western nuclear powers though.  MAD only applies when one nuclear country is going to nuke another nuclear country.  I don't think that the threat of a US nuclear strike on Israel would be credible enough to dissuade any behavior, especially if Israel felt they were facing an existential threat.  If Israel nukes Turkey then the best thing to do is for third parties to dismantle Israel's military and help Turkey recover.  If Turkey had nukes and was worried about it, then they may want to make a credible public statement that they will use them in retaliation. Even so if they have already been nuked it is too late for prevention and the must humanitarian action may be to stay your hand and let the world take care of the problem through non-nuclear means.  As I said before there are few if any times when the indiscriminate killing of civilians is an appropriate policy reaction.
Where do you get off asking questions in a reddit comment thread?!?!   This story has a cop and a kitten.  Please consult the hive mind for appropriate responses and today's acceptable level of outrage.
DISGUSTING.
*slow clap*
Actually, multi tasking isn't so hard. It's just that a lot of people are spending way too much time looking at their moving units. Playing starcraft, you have to fight the urge to see every little thing that happens and go back to macro. Battles hypnotize you. What league are you in?
Primerica us the "direct sales" arm of Citibank.  It very much is supported by Citibank and Citi services it's loans.
I just moved to all grain a couple batches prior to this, and this too was my first time re-using yeast. Just bought a mill, so I'm hoping between that and re-using yeast, my batch price will plummet.
One year, four months. Ha! Suck it! 
Reminds me of the perfect geek girl.  Totally adorable.
Watch out  about that stoking business: http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=QgXObaM9i2Q
I love free rein chicken.
Nuke them both so we don't have to hear about this shit anymore.
Because that's how it's been since humans first existed. People are afraid of dying. Religious fairy tales give them hope for an afterlife. It's really as simple as that.
Everything looks like it's spelled write to me.
You pretty much can though... Set up some pop-forwarding and perhaps some labels in gmail for recieving and sorting incoming mail to the various accounts.  I also think you can "attach" one mail account to another and then send mail from both accounts, from one. Not completely sure but almost. With gmail that is, dunno about gmail + yahoo though. 
Today we salute you Mr. Covert Titty Cameraman. Where others dare not to snap, you went right ahead and captured all that glory. 
I think we just found the solution to the problem of where to dump our nuclear waste.
Israel would embarrass Turkey. BADLY.
&lt;jeremy clarkson&gt;I went on the internet, and found this!&lt;/jeremy clarkson&gt;
The thing that will make third parties "viable" is voting for them. I do.  If you don't then stop bitching.
This video is not available in WebM/VP8, so no play on a flashless system. :-(
nope, not the wolf one.  Actually just found it.  This guy: http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=1iqfUlQIav0#t=3m08s not really scary anymore
Chromes translate function screws up the photo.
&gt;film in general  Film in general is about an awkward, pathetic, pasty, unemployed self-deprecating man, who gets all the girls and beats much stronger men in hand-to-hand combat? Or do you mean film in general is melodramatic fantasy fulfilment trash? I think you've been watching some very bad films.
I saw a documentary about porn in which cute girls doing graduate research explained how psychologically detrimental it was to see hundreds of hard core porn. They'd count how many expressions and references of such and such thing (expressions of fear, pain, pleasure, etc.) there was in each clip. Believe it or not, science goes as deep as you can imagine. 
I didn't make it about race. I just linked to a website that did.
Your gravity is ridiculous!
Was having a shitty day here too until I saw your cute picture.  Thanks for cheering me up!
[Christian Science Monitor](http://csmonitor.com)
that was interesting reading, just for the sake of perspective
Even better; get a butterfly tattoo tramp stamp!
If you like that, I'm sure you will also like this: http://consumerist.com/2006/06/the-worlds-most-expensive-hamburger.html
Nothing spells love like a restraining order
I think I just got an ear-rection
Depends.  How much money are you willing to accept in exchange for your soul?
Same here. Shouldn't have bothered with it in the first place. 
"Don't get too close; we might get tangled up."
Haha that makes it so much better. Go watch it right now.
A man was drunk and got hit by a train. Since this comment is about lawsuit, I'm assuming he sued the train company.
When I go drinking it's usually, five drinks, try to remain standing for 10 seconds and then pass out on the floor for a while.  It's much the same in-game, but when Mercer stands up he's sober 4 out of 5 times. Not been having any luck getting those drunk duel challenges I've heard about.
[Done.](http://www.reddit.com/r/pics/comments/ca0uv/that_crater_looks_enormous_we_need_more_photos_of/c0r59eg?context=1)
try Hoover's Handbook of American Businesses
I'm very thankful that I live in a traditional open-carry state with reasonable CCL background check and a "shall issue" mandate within 30 days of application. However, open or concealed carry (or even bringing a weapon onto the property) is completely outlawed on college campuses. As I'm starting school next month, I find this highly disconcerting in light of Virginia Tech and other such incidents.  Of course the adage of "tried by 12 rather than carried by 6" applies. Perhaps you could use your situation as a rallying point for citizen activism or a voter referendum? Unlikely to be successful but it could raise visibility. Have you considered writing to your state legislators?
P.p.s if you want to keep your sanity and dignity as a human being do **not** google "unbirthing".
Maybe just express to the family that you've got a lot of things that you'd like to be doing with your life, and dedicating an entire day every week to them is a lot of your time to be devoting to them.  Also, explain to your boyfriend that you want to be dating HIM, not his entire family. And tell him that this is a big problem for you... has he offered any suggestions for the problem?
Kids are so freakin' adorable...teach him well!
glad i could help
That is, unless the supplement has a negligible effect on most of the children- which desperately gullible parents rave about- making this guy's company sufficient money to just settle out of court with the dozen or so families who have enough money after paying for ridiculous autism treatments to pay for legal representation that (in court) could magically prove how this 'supplement' was unquestionably responsible for having done harm.
No.
Me: Why is a movie critic posing such a political question?
Instead of provoking middle-eastern maniacs into war, lets just continue paying them a relatively small amount of money indefinitely so they don't get into a big war.  If someone told me that for the cost of the Iraq war there would be relative peace between Egypt and Israel for the next 100 years, I would take that deal in a minute. We should continue to push peacefully for the dignity of all human beings regardless of label.  Every year without war moves us closer to a peaceful world.
&gt;Let's face it buddy, there's no chance in hell that a country which defines itself on race and religion will survive.  Yeah, I remember England's collapse and the sacking of London.  Those were terrible days.
What the...I swear it said international waters when I wrote my comment. Very trixy.
LOL
Thanks 4chan
Ah, like Bjork
You're welcome! Ask me any questions you have in the process, I'll be happy to help :)
An Israeli propaganda site? Why yes, yes you will lose all your points.
[Mushroom Chicken!!!!](http://www.reddit.com/r/chickenfighters/comments/ca20c/mushroom_chicken/)
This was an incredibly distasteful response. I don't believe someone could survive 14 days without water, but there are better ways to educate than merely asserting the fact while repeatedly calling the Indian government stupid and dumb.   Yes it was silly for the researching team to come to the conclusion that they did, but it is even worse for Randi to provide a rebuttal almost void of explanation but almost entirely consisting of derision. No person i have worked with would speak like this; this is not representative of the true culture of science. 
i don't agree that this is a war crime.  i think the argument of international waters or not is moot... everyone knew the intentions of the ships and whether IDF waits another 50 miles to me is not relevant.  it was going to happen.  IMO probably was a premeditated to take the ships in international waters as the ships would be less prepared - thus less chance of violence.  let's remember 5 ships are reported (as of now) as being taken without 'violence'.  until the protesters on those ships can speak, i have to take that on face value.  I think ship 6 assault has undoubtedly proved itself to be a terribly designed and executed mission.  For all their claimed 'intelligence' they apparently had no idea of the level of resistance they'd encounter.  if they would have prepared for this kind of resistance, they easily have the resources to prevent this from happening.  a bunch of angry protestors with gas masks, sticks, knives, chairs, whatever - is no real threat to the IDF if they'd prepared properly.  if they did that, no one would be dead.  whoever planned the mission is in BIG trouble.
I was walking down the street and a group of girls in a limo shouted "You're hot!' at me. I may be a male 50-foot-fakeout.
It doesn't matter what country you live in, someone at sometime died so that you could sit on your ass and be a dick on the internet.
If this guy's actual rationale for wanting the death penalty for homosexuality is that some gay people do some weird stuff, I can't wait to hear his plan about Japan once he discovers some of the stuff some people do there.  Other thoughts that I'm too lazy to format into fully coherent thoughts:  a)  A MacBook Pro?  In Uganda?  Really?  b)  "PooPoo?"  c)  The video is the part where kids should leave the room, but listening to this guy rant about how those damn queers all suck shit out of each others' assholes and fist each other in the rectum is PG-13?
Hurricane season starts tomorrow.  Just sayin'.
&gt; titty fucking erosion  So the Rockies are next?
Like Destos says, don't click that link. Click this one:  https://www.dropbox.com/referrals/NTEwNzkzNTU5
Direct link to labeled image:  http://chandra.harvard.edu/photo/2010/n49/n49_labeled_420.jpg
Before I answer your questions, I'd like to address the elephant in the room. As I see it, the one question you have asked that might affect my initial argument was this:  &gt;Do all animals suffer as we do?  My answer is: All of the animals we most frequently kill for food experience pain, bivalve mollusks &amp; the like being possible exceptions.   Based on that, I more or less see our initial argument as over. Because if the reasoning I initially presented is sound, we're pretty much done here. Right?  The rest is basically up to you. You may well decide to ignore or attempt to devalue the obvious implications of this by calling it "opinion", but in the end how you act in the face of reason has no affect on reason itself.   The rest of your questions are interesting and worthy of debate, but again, as I see it they have no effect on my initial argument:  &gt;Can animals be moral agents?  Does this have a bearing on the pain they experience? I don't think so. Human infants lack moral agency, yet feel pain.   &gt;What is your view of animal testing?  While a related issue, this is a different one, and arguments for or against it would take a different form. In a nutshell, my opinion on the matter is very similar to Peter Singer's. But back to eating animals...  &gt;Moreoever, what of raising food animals in an ethical manner?  This strikes me, in a strictly logical sense, as akin to asking if offering a condemned man a last cigarette mitigates the larger action of executing him. It may well be *more* ethical to not torture an animal before killing it, but killing it remains wrong, and anything contributing to that end occurs within that framework.  &gt;Is death considered suffering in your view?  As an atheist I view death as a non-state. However, the process of dying may well be seen as involving suffering, along with any pain related to the cause of the dying.
i love these new t-shirts! Great job!
Thanks. I did not get any college credits, however i would like to spend a while in college since i really don't feel ready for the work force at the moment. I might do 3 years.
&gt; Sometimes lying and deceiving is just too hard to get out of, her being bored is just how it stopped.  This is true.  Good.  &gt; He would have stopped eventually.  You don't know that.  &gt; I'm sure he could still have sex with her if he wanted to, he stopped because he was guilty.  Now, this is entirely conjecture.  You are not sure: only he and she can possibly know this for certain; you are just a random third party making pitifully wishful guesses.
It's blue. Bongun.
You know, you're probably right, it will most likely disappear in a week or so.   I just feel like I'm out of touch with regular skin care habits that girls have, that I wondered if anyone could offer me an epiphany. My skin is pretty sensitive, but I'm laid back, so I try to find a balance.
I gotta agree that fargy is a fucking coward.
Wabbit season!
I'm ashamed to admit, I clicked on this immediately to make sure it wasn't the BAND he was talking about.  Whew. =)
These are also the ones that are the worst.
http://tinyurl.com/qr83nh
Perhaps we can work out a trade of sorts... You guys have tons of stuff we don't have access to up here in igloo-land... Cheap liquor for example.
iPod shuffle, watch, nothing else.  I leave my keys in the mail bin so I can pick them up when I come back. Please don't tell anyone.  Isn't running with a water bottle in your hand supposed to be bad for your stride? 
 Al Gore?
You are totally right. [10% of the male population have red-green color-blindness...](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Color_blindness#Epidemiology)
I was thinking more like, punch my boss in the face and fuck everything with nipples and legs...  ... but if you've got a spaceship...
Awesomeness
The time for peace and talk is long since over. Its about fucking time they fight it out already.
No, it's stupid as far as password security goes. The more hoops you make people jump, the more likely they are to write it down. A weak password in the head beats 50 characters of noise on a post-it on the monitor.
I started at 22, had my first at 27, decided to adopt my oldest the same year, and am thinking about possibly trying again or adopting again when these two are in school full-time (3-4 years from now, when I'm 30).  I wish we got a house first and that I had spent some time building a career first. I stayed home for almost 3 years between the two kids, and now have to go back to college again just to get my foot in the door somewhere. C'est la vie though.
Steams getting one?  But what will run on it? I've been using Steam and Wine for sometime now - that all works well, but it's kind of hacky at the same time.
I have a custom domain with a catchall.   So if I'm signing up for xtube, I use xtube@domain.com  they never seem to pick up on that ;p
seriously doubt that
I SAID GOOD DAY.
You mean "The Courtyard of the Genitals"? I think that's what they're calling the new Vatican day camp for young boys who can keep a secret.
Fat pants and rave fashion in general.  Silly times.
Heat that sticks to you.  Sticks to you so much that when you enter an air conditioned building, you have to wait about 1 minute for the heat to dissipate off of you.
&gt; The dapper brotherhood of the stationary Tuxedo  FTFY
I'm not clicking on that video.
Agreed, no landscape is a ding on the Apple dock.  Plus these stands let you just drop it in place without lining up the plug.  And you can have them in different rooms without spending a hundred bucks.
1984, 7th grade....black parachute pants with all the zippers. They. Were. Awesome.
Humans are goal driven, if you have no goals what else are you going to do? When I feel down about anything, I just reflect on why I feel this way. Try not to lie to yourself about why you're like this, like don't make excuses for yourself to be like this. My reason for living is the accumulation of knowledge, I want to me a wise man when I am old. Try to figure out ways to get out of your situation, make lists or something, there are plenty of things to do to get out of depression. Also, are you doing things that make you happy? I find doing stuff that contributes to others helps me, and making other people happy makes me feel good, since I use my experience of being happy to know how it feels and give it to others. yada yada.
Wasn't impressed with those paintings either.
Greetings from Freeworlds, fellow modders!
I cannot WAIT to be 65 yrs old!  I hope to be as in tune as you seem to be :)  
Autechre for sure. Lithops. Some Mouse on Mars. Oval. Bisk. Fred Frith. John Zorn David Slusser.
Condolences.   Also, what a great pet-sport!
He's a shill. You're not going to change his mind. He's only interested in softening the blow to Israel's image. 
...wow.
Rotating webcam and PixelQ is the most appealing aspect. I can totally see me using that in classroom.
I majored in philosophy and psychology and what landed me my first job was my HTML knowledge. What landed me my current job was basic office skills that I picked up as an intern. Honestly, I'm not sure what you could do with either aside from perhaps becoming a teacher or pursuing the academic end of it further. Either way, the more skills you can pick up the better it will serve you in the long run.
Keep in mind this is just the "default" live CD use case.  You can make it look like a normal system too, if you install to a hard drive and mount a partition out of Puppy's watchful eyes.  Or if you disable the cool features. The entire "core" system (/usr/, /etc/, everything on the live CD) is a compressed SquashFS system.  It is read only.  Changes are stored in a separate file system overlayed with either Aufs or UnionFS.  (Every year or so Puppy switches between the two based on performance/reliability.) Assuming you are running Puppy on a CD-R or DVD-R (without a hard drive), your changes get SquashFS'ed and appended to the end of the disk.  Normally, all of these sessions get reapplied on boot, but you can choose to ignore a few (or all) to rollback the file system.  (IIRC, Puppy was the first live CD to save back to the disk.)  This works pretty good with CD-Rs (no real limit on the number of appended sessions) and pretty stupid on DVD+Rs (99 session limit). If you run on a USB flash drive or SSD, it'll store changes in ram and write them back every 10 minutes or so, greatly extending the life of the drive.  I forget how rollback-able this setup is, but you always have the option to ignore all changes and boot the virgin OS. Regarding running as root - it is basically on the same level as not vaccinating your kid.  And there is a general feeling that it will be dealt with when it is a problem, when Puppy is a sizable fraction of Linux installs. If it got popular, they'd fix it.  Probably by using passwordless sudo :-) edit: I should fix "compressed SquashFS system" but it is making me laugh.
So by your logic, it is also ethical to use humans as non-consenting subjects in experiments?
ass graft
And if any of us tried that in the West, the thief would sue us and WE would be the ones in jail.
Nope. A hole swallowed 12 homes in 2007.  Nice attempt at explaining, though!
&gt; even if we'd cut 100% of co2 emotions we'd be hopelessly doomed.  Actually, if we cut 100% of co2 *emotions* the world would be a lot more civil and less stressed-out. :-) Until the doom&amp;gloomers invented the *next* plausible "crisis" to worry about, I suppose...
Proving that white americans don't have a monopoly on bigotry
I will research my options thanks.
It is exactly that type of humor that makes this show so great!
See, I really do see where you're coming from, but you're so incredibly tactless (and possibly ignorant) that it's working to your detriment, here.  The woman in the video is talking about how society places all of a woman's worth in her beauty. It doesn't matter if she's smart, if she's creative, if she's a hard worker -- those things are secondary to her physical appearance. This is truer than you think, too, because a pretty/dumb woman can excel in life far more than an ugly/hardworking one. Men don't have that kind of relationship with their bodies.  Please read [this](http://www.telegraph.co.uk/fashion/stellamagazine/7725736/Women-and-body-image-a-mans-perspective.html) enlightening article for a better understanding of the differences between the way the genders relate to their bodies. Men exist in a world where their bodies are almost moot, but for a woman, her body is who she is. This is a societal mindset and it is hurtful to everyone - not just women.
Cthulhu
It's funny to me, because I am gonna go out on a limb here and say....if this was Iran doing this you would say oh they need to be bombed for this. However, in this instance you and your tea and cookies approach is what you would do.   Horse shit. 
You're a dick. But you're right, I misread your comment.   I feel conflicting emotions.
He would no longer be a friend if he just up and slapped some random girl for shits and giggles.
Don't even have that key on my laptop or pound sign only $.  Kiwi laptops don't come with them. Have to know alt codes for that!
You can't tell what happened first and what does it matter?
You are correct Wokkel. This was NOT a "humanitarian only" mission. It was an act of aggression by Turkey and must be correctly identified as such.
i was gonna make a post about that app, it's a great app for security and i recommend it for everyone!
Ahh, thank you :D One copy is going on my locker (I go to a catholic school), another on my door!
That would be possession of child pr0n.  Why don't you have a seat right over here....
So those worms in Dune are real?
My father's been a professional for 30+ years now... I'm used to getting told to pay attention :P
Or it's because Reddit is A BUNCH OF WHITE PEOPLE.
&gt;It's the limit in which changes in electromagnetic field propagate "fast enough" to cover the whole system in question: the system is smaller than the wavelength of light so you just consider the light to be "flat".  I'm not quite sure I understand.  By system do you mean an actual physical device? Like the device isn't longer than the wavelength of whatever type of light its interacting with?
Why do so many Americans think there are no black Europeans? There's plenty of black French nationals, and the country has a history of involvement in Africa, when they were competing with Britain and other European nations to colonise the continent. Take the [French national soccer team](http://i.imgur.com/eiUI9.jpg) for example..
Glad to hear it. Thanks.
I once went out with a bunch of friends and we got drunk to the point where we got cut off.  We just left a random amount of money and staggered off. Some days later, I went back and apologized to the waitress for our unruly behaviour and explained that I wasn't sure we'd left enough money for her and that I would of course make up the difference if we hadn't. She burst out laughing.  "You guys left me a hundred-dollar tip!  And I was sure you'd be mad at me for cutting you off too!"
Give them their due-- they make excellent entertainers.  Comedians, shuck-and-jive dancers, heroin addict musicians.  Rappers.  Very, very occasionally even presidents.  But mostly, just shoeshine boys.
FWIW, I upvoted your question because it's important. And the link answers your question directly: *What treaty do you think Israel violated by boarding this vessel?* because mostly everybody is referring to the *UN Convention on the Law of the Sea*.  And please don't use the anti-semitism card, just because you lack skills to present an argument.
Now onto the science part. A belief is basically a conclusion or opinion that you accept as true.  You say that you wish to believe by way of a simple choice to have faith (belief based on trust instead of based on factual evidence and logical reasoning).  I would say that this is a very bad way to reach a conclusion, it's also known as a "leap of faith" or "jumping to a conclusion".  This is a different method for forming opinions about the world than using a process that gathers factual evidence, applies logical reasoning, weighs the results and reaches conclusions. This is not a false dichotomy (dividing something up into two parts which do not overlap), because religion does make claims about things like how the earth came into existence, how old it is, what will happen to it, etc.  These are claims about the physical world, not just about the supernatural. Many of the early scientists also believed things like the world is flat, everything is made from earth, air, wind and fire, lead can be turned into gold, etc.  The claim that they believed in your particular god is again just a logical fallacy.  In all of these cases, the reason that their beliefs were wrong, is that they were not able to gather enough evidence to then apply logical reasoning too, in order to get a more true result.  Subsequently, all of these wrong conclusions / beliefs about the world have been corrected by using a process of gathering evidence and evaluating information in order to come to correct results (science).   A divine revelation does not correct itself in this way, anyone can claim they had a divine revelation that means anything, and people frequently have, even today in christian circles.  Faith lacks this process, and is a flawed method for reaching truth.  The final difference between science and faith, is that science can only give the best answer for the evidence and reasoning that is currently available.  This is why skeptics like myself never accept any conclusions from science as 100% accurate.  Faith on the other hand, is often a total trust, where the conclusions are held to be 100% accurate, even though there is no way to support that conclusion.  The last comment you made is that science is only a valid process for uncovering truth about this universe (aka reality).  I am perfectly happy uncovering truth about reality, and not about imaginary worlds which "transcend" (or are beyond) reality.  There are an infinite number of imaginary worlds, none of those should be of greater concern to you than the real world we actually live in (and I have enjoyed some excellent works of fiction in my day...)
haha
&gt; You can clearly see in the video that they soldiers are using paintball guns, and are immediately set upon by the throng of awaiting protesters. I absolutely believe that those soldiers felt they were in a threatening situation and acted out of self defence  There is a failure of logic at this point to me.  If you are conducting a "police action" and are surprised because the person turns violent, I can see using minimal force in your own self defense as reasonable.   But it stops right there.  You halt the operation because it is not turning out how you expect.   Instead what we have is an escalation - send in all the troops, storm the ship, death of people on board must not be allowed to interrupt your mission.   So - the first guy who went down was acting self defense - maybe - the dozens of troopers who came afterwards, in full knowledge of the hostile situation?  That was an attack.
Velvet pants cause the horizon to shift. It's a well-known photographic principle.
CONGRATULATIONS!
That's just retarded.  It's YOUR fucking property.  You can do whatever the FUCK you want to any pest on it.
Hey, IDF social network army! You may be a giraffe but you are predictable and boring and saddening too.
The [skip divided](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ZpbzBz6GfWE) remix by Modeselektor is really good. I got the remix album of Thom Yorke's solo album, but that's really the only track I really listen to.
I wonder if Uwe Boll is available?
Do you like FPS games? I'd trade both Gears of War games for JC2.
She told him to say that.
Would NATO dissolve if one member nation decides to aggressively attack another nation? What you may call defense others call offense. NATO doesn't have to dissolve if one nation goes to war offensively without the support of others.
Not easy to tell trolls from anti-jewish nutbags either. Though we don't have to many of either around here.   We do however have alot of folks with absolutely no willingness to accept nuance in their view of the Israeli-Palestinian conflict.
Raaaaage
Like holy rattlesnakes that fell all round your feet?
is it true you're a white guy?
It was the "Thaaaaaaanks..." that did it.
So I've heard... Its really a Pepsi-Coke kinda deal.
Do the D A N C E
Hi. Someone called?
&gt;Draw Zuckerberg(, drawing Mohammed, drawing Obama, drawing Zuckerberg)^n.  FTFY.   Sorry, too much programming for me lately. :)
I've actually just gone to Transmission, largely 'cos of the native peerguardian stuff.  It actually feels a bit like uTorrent, just a bit thinner.
999 more votes to go!  Hell, I bought this shirt just for the kicks of it!  http://www.reddit.com/r/reddit.com/comments/c8kqd/dear_reddituser_im_probably_drunk/c0r06z7?context=3
Man a site name like that and they're behaving like a less reputable site.  Like foxnews.com
Wow. That was incredibly informative and not redundant at all.
Good lord, I didn't even paste it in! http://www.amazon.com/Iron-Fist-Neon-Zebracorn-Hoodie/dp/B003DWQE1G  There we go. It's also on the Iron Fist website. It's also a woman's hoodie, unfortunately.
I was thinking the same thing, and I've been looking around stores for what looks like a good oil free moisturizer, but nothing has caught my eye.   Do you have any recommendations?
Here, have a downvote anyway
Most birds can't smell, actually.
I'm an ambitious little snot and I was born and bred professional. Like I said, I've been publishing since I was 14 and did a ton of research about how to not come off as a clueless newb to editors. That being said, as an editor I give a lot more leeway then I would have given myself. My writers are 13-21, they're busy studying for SAT's and trying not to get pregnant. If they email me like an old friend, I'm going to treat it with the same respect as an email from someone who addresses me professionally.   Don't use slang, shorthand, or address me as "yo."  Anything the lines of "Dear Editor," "Miss J***", "Dear [My first name]" is all just peachy to me.   How did I work my way up the ladder? A lot presumption, anonymity never hurts, and my website. Jesus--yes, build a portfolio website. It impresses people.
Never should have come near that ship... its just a disaster on all levels for Israel.. I can understand that they had to defend themselves in that situation when things got as rough as this, but the fact that it came to that was because they decided it was a good idea to stop a ship full of medical supplies and food for innocent people in a desperate state. Honestly there is SO much hate between these two nations, its just... i see America becoming friends with Iran before Israel does with Palestine.
Personally, I'd prefer a girl that didn't curse. Makes them seem more classy. 
You want me to open a youtube account and link to any humanitarian group right now and say I'm the head honcho at whatever humanitarian group you choose and post a rick astley video claiming he's a terrorist and that my humanitarian group (whichever one you choose) is putting out a contract on him?  Shit for brains.
Your first pic is sexier than any of the others if you ask me.  Very nice :)
You can get a legit iso, Microsoft will gladly sell them to [you](http://store.microsoft.com/microsoft/Windows-Windows-7/category/102) also doing it by hand is just... stupid nowadays. Just use the handy [ms tool](http://store.microsoft.com/Help/ISO-Tool) and it is about as easy as burning the iso, if not easier.
Overly sentimental bullshit.  Their son died for nothing.
He's not the star...he's Mr. Manager!
&gt;but McDonalds doesn't care because they love everyone's wallet.  Fixed that for you
&gt;Yeah. And suddenly we have allot more of those people that can't see out the wind shield, because they are using a fold-out-map while driving.  That's one of those things one looks back on and wonders how there weren't more deaths directly attributable to. it
I was going to suggest league of legends, but a problem is that you can buy power in the form of better characters. They are very close to a well tiered system though.  Another problem is their skins are fucking expensive! Some of them are $10 or more just for a reskin.
If you want to go with your extension of the analogy. Israel went downtown and shot people who they thought might enter their home. You see this happened in INTERNATIONAL WATERS. If the IDF had waited until the ship entered Israeli waters you might have a point, but they didn't. Just as it would be considered cold blooded murder to kill someone who you felt threatened by before they were on your property this is cold blooded murder and piracy.
No, but I did have a nametag with my picture on it. It made me feel like Scully.
I wonder if it would be worth using if I "found" one. &gt;_&gt;
FINALLY. I have truly arrived. I've been waiting for you to comment on one of my posts (unless perhaps I missed it before).
I used to have a computer power key right next to the backspace.  There was no "are you sure you want to power down" either.
A very watchable in-depth analysis of 2001.  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=P95NWAHWLrc
&gt;Let the military decide...  Isn't the President of the United States a very important figure in the direction of the armed forces?  It is not the mark of a healthy society that thinks the success of our nation hinges on the whims of a single man or party.  Say it were to happen; I want to be included as member of a people who could survive the election to power of an out-and-out Hitler. I want a nation were it is simply not possible for that kind of man to gain a foothold.  And for the most part I think I do. I think we shout and stomp ever louder and more vigorously over less and less.
; Powell finds your lack of faith disturbing.
Emergence day.
The [National Youth Rights Association](http://www.youthrights.org) is a helpful group you would be well-served to contact.
Yeah... when that was posted as a comment in the first "been this angry" thread, and then you went and posted the same thing.
Uh SubSonic?
Jewish Terrorist?? WTF? Why do stupid and racist people always try to confuse Israel "A Nation State" as acting on behalf of the Jewish Religion? 
Interesting... anybody know what they are for?
And how about that, a garbage can type device down there for broken pipe pieces. How thoughtful of them!
My heart rate seems to be more or less the same as it was before. I just keep getting the feeling of it "skipping a beat" so to speak.
Jinkos anyone?   (I think that's how they were spelled. You know. Those crazy baggy jeans.)
It just seems too circular. That makes it creepy to me.
I like the spot of your back you leave showing between your shirt and shorts.
Should post her nudes.
Asus wants to generate interest so that people buy their stocks. They take the money then do more R&amp;D. I would doubt if this release was supposed to generate interest amongst consumers.  If it was for consumers they would have put more effort into promoting it publicly.
The way I see it is that Science is finally figuring out the innards of this "metaphysical" thing
If there is something that made you worry, telling me that someone is meant to be in control of it only makes it worse.
She looks like she is thinking, "Do not fucking touch me."  I know that look.
Libs, as in liberals?  This is a poor attempt, even for Krugman.  Libertarianism and anarchism are the only political philosophies even attempting to address the fallibility of elected politicians.  Everyone else is still trying to push a broken cart.  
Slightly easier said than done.
I hate NASCAR
If you understand how Mozart writes you probably are smart.
Weren't they defending themselves from (essentially) pirates?
Trim above, shave below.  And I use my standard face razor (Gillette Fusion Power) and standard shaving soap (Col. Conks).  Though I do it for myself, my girl doesn't give a fuck either way.
Shit.  I knew her name immediately.
&gt;I do believe in people who will try to do crazy things to me in his name, so it's perfectly logical that I should fear that right? Yes, but to fear them more than you fear any other group who's capable of doing crazy things to you is sensationalist, especially since there are many more pressing possibilities. &gt;I do think that though that having your core ideologies based on irrational ideas tends to promote irrational behaviors, if only slightly. But it's irrational only to you. &gt;My problem is when people try and impose their point of view on me And you can't argue that their irrational, since doing so tries to impose your point of view on them.  Sure, religion only exists in the mind, but so do the rules of logic.
There's a community on livejournal for political news that I read pretty much every day.
Sometimes the family wants that Italian taste without those tiny Italian portions...
No tags = Stray.  Any animal on my property without tags is fair game.  It's NOT a PET it's a PEST.  PESTS DIE.
Saw that coming.
[Much Better](http://s-ak.buzzfed.com/static/imagebuzz/terminal01/2009/3/16/11/drive-thru-grammar-police-22772-1237217113-4.jpg)
No we don't have to wait. This is a very interesting concept with potentially fantastic, and again very interesting, implications. There's really no reason to wait.
I will once that Nigerian prince gets back to me with the cash he owes me.
This happens to all cross country runners. It is part of the sport.
I thought it more striking that non autistic atheists gave a nonanswer when it came to answering questions about the origin of a event
You could start by RTFA.
In my experience, education in post-war world history is pretty lax in the States. I didn't learn about apartheid in school. 
Megan, do you look like a dude?
Absolute perfection...
Sure thing and best of luck.
This site has been around forever, and it was where I got my first exposure to the world of fetish and kink.  I share it with you, reddit. Enjoy. 
And yet despite this resolution, Rand Paul still enjoys a [healthy lead over his establishment rival](http://thehill.com/blogs/ballot-box/senate-races/100673-rand-paul-leading-conway-in-kentucky-poll-).  They tried to empty both barrels into him and the man is still standing.  
Looks like just color and vignetting to me, for a long exposure the color seems rather dull
Fuck staples my managers won't sell PCs unless people buy one of those shit product plans. Once our various precentages for our sales quotas are at met for the week we won't sell shit. Fuck those assholes.
i beg to differ. it's dumb, and hilarious. 
nice colouring!
I'm not going to stop using animals, nor do I think it's horribly wrong. Sorry. Thus, your occasional evangelism will come across to all but the fence-sitter as obnoxiousness.  Evangelical Christians think I'm "horribly wrong" for not believing in God, and many of them have complex arguments for why that's so. However, I disagree with their arguments and realize they will always disagree with mine. That's why I wish people could respect others' rights to make their own decisions.
In loco parentis? They have the right to act like crazy parents?
Any reason why that couldn't have been dispersed with tear gas or rubber bullets? Those are not guerrillas with RPGs and AK-47s, those are civilians with pans and sticks; no responsible government orders the MURDER of civilians... You can find examples of the government shooting civilians, and in all cases there have been sanctions from the international community. 
[They match up pretty well against robocop](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=iRZ1yid7sYY&amp;feature=player_embedded)
What is with all the buffalo hate? It only sucks here 10 months of the year, and we don't get hurricanes.
I think there are factors in every conflict that don't work that well with International Law... which is already pretty piss weak at times.  You can't say that Gaza is part of Israel when both Israel and Gaza say it's not... which is why I think it gets treated in the International Conflict category. Incidentally things like the Geneva Convention don't apply to internal conflicts... so treating it as international is beneficial to Palestinians.
Especially if your name is Larry.
Make it private.
Ho noes, he said a sweary word!!!
Pfft, that makes about as much sense as a screen door on a battleship
Pretend?
Agreed. They are internet tough guys who make the 4chaners seem like cyborg warriors.
Well sadly, the Internet is not your little bubbling pool of absolutes. Subjectively, you're an idiot. Objectively? You're an idiot.  Stop typing, get an education, come back.
Nein?
I know she's had some family and emotional problems in the past, but her life has been going better then ever lately, as far as I know. We have recently become friends with a newer group of people. And these are the ones that I mentioned her calling me names to. They told me they think it's some sort of jealousy thing, but I find that hard to understand. She spends more time alone with them then I do, and I think that they probably like her more than me. This is why the jealousy thing seems odd to me. 
Label is French for rain.
[Oprah's Response!](http://iamwriteherelol.files.wordpress.com/2009/03/oprah.jpg)
Three simple things to remember if you run into an apologist (be they paid agents or just perhaps a bit misguided):  &gt;* Israeli soldiers invaded these ships in international waters, breaking international law, and, in killing civilians, committed a war crime. The counter-claim by Israeli commanders that their soldiers responded to an imminent “lynch” by civilians should be dismissed with the loud contempt it deserves.  &gt;* The Israeli government approved the boarding of these aid ships by an elite unit of commandoes. They were armed with automatic weapons to pacify the civilians onboard, but not with crowd dispersal equipment in case of resistance. Whatever the circumstances of the confrontation, Israel must be held responsible for sending in soldiers and recklessly endangering the lives of all the civilians onboard, including a baby.   &gt;* Israel has no right to control Gaza’s sea as its own territorial waters and to stop aid convoys arriving that way. In doing so, it proves that it is still in belligerent occupation of the enclave and its 1.5 million inhabitants. And if it is occupying Gaza, then under international law Israel is responsible for the welfare of the Strip’s inhabitants. Given that the blockade has put Palestinians there on a starvation diet for the past four years, Israel should long ago have been in the dock for committing a crime against humanity.  [Source](http://www.alternet.org/story/147052/3_facts_you_need_to_know_about_the_israeli_attack_on_peace_activists_on_the_gaza_flotilla/)
Before I say anything I just want to clarify that I don't disagree with you because you are gay, black, or a man. I've had several friends who were black and many friends who were gay and I never had a problem with any of them, and I'm a man and I don't hate men. Some of my best friends are men. In fact I wouldn't have been bothered if one of my black friends had been gay, it just doesn't matter to me. I'm blind to sex, sexual preference, and race I just don't notice them when I'm considering the merits of a person's arguments or anything else about them. None of it is important and none of it factored into my current disagreement with you my flamboyant brother!  There are regulations guiding this subreddit and they should guide the actions of the mods in all of their actions here, no exceptions.
Oh yeah? Well, about 150,000,000 km from here there is a giant ball of gas fusing under its own gravity -- a nuclear fireball that has lasted about 5,000,000,000 years so far. And I got a shot of it!
and they bitch about pirating.
Most of the other reports I've seen on this put the number killed at a minimum of 19.
Very highly trained armies though. What those countries lack in numbers they certainly make up for in top of the line training. 
You don't mention how long drunk.  The body does use sweat, along with peeing, breathing and the liver (gets most, but not all of it), to get rid of alcohol.  Steady heavy drinkers do trend towards excessive sweating, esp. under exertion.  (Ask (usually) the wife, she sees it in the sheets, although usually doesn't know why.)
So is Afghanistan.  Although Israel should be on the front page every weekend, since the US is paying for Israel's continual state-sponsored terrorist attacks.
The healthiest is to nod in silent acknowledgement, while noticing the subtle emotional impressions that the video is provoking on you.   Well, this according to zen mindfulness practices.   (You've gotta take care not only of your actions but also of your psyche).
Are you the guy that yelled "GET A JOB" at me on a Sunday? 'Cause that made me laugh.
mind = blown
Where in Canada?
Ok, granted.  However, I live just a scant handful of miles away from the former site of the Trojan Nuclear power plant, a structure that was torn down because most of the local population was "afraid" of the plant, even though none of them have been on the grounds of the plant itself.   And what I mean by that is that all around Trojan was a beautiful manmade wetlands, and a lush, well-wooded frisbee golf structure next to it.  Both of these were open to the public as a show of good faith that they were being excellent stewards of the local natural resources.  I know a lot about the plant, seeing as how my father was a high ranking security guard there, and my best friend's father was one of the guys behind the switches at the plant.   I guess my point is that modern techniques for containment on these nuclear plants are extremely conscientious of the environment around it.  Incongruously enough, I would believe the "state officials" in this instance, especially since it would seem that these "officials" really have nothing to gain by keeping it open.   Hell, maybe I'm wrong, and maybe these people aren't as conscious of the ecological damage they're doing around them.  If I am wrong, though, they're all damn fools.
Likewise, but I'll cop to both at a push. :-)
Obviously you didn't bother to take off you hasbara glasses and actually try to read something that might show Israels guilt.
Got 30100 on first try. Skipped bonus stage though because I'm going to work in 30 minutes :(.
Red ones are the best
You can start by looking at the Fortune 500.
Thanks for the pointer.
&gt; People who aren't libertarians seem to think they can accurately predict preference curves.  I think you've managed to misrepresent the views of both non-libertarians and Austrian economists with a single statement.  This point of contention by Austrian economists isn't about 'predictions' but about assumptions, and it isn't a very consequential difference anyway.  &gt; Libertarians aren't arrogant enough to think they can fix the economy by fucking with it.  In this case, libertarians have definitely taken the easy way out.  Regardless of political leanings you can guarantee the economy *will* be fucked with, out of political necessity if not economic necessity, which will work or not.  Non-libertarians take the credit or the fall for being right or wrong.  Libertarians can always fall back on blaming the government or saying the market isn't free enough when it appears they are wrong.  I'd think that adopting views that are never held to empirical scrutiny and claiming to be right is a greater mark of arrogance. 
I grew up reading FBFW and have always left like the Patterson's were like a family to me.  Mike and I are roughly the same age.  We got married roughly at the same time and had kids at roughly the same time. I miss Farley.  I wept for **DAYS** when Farley died.
Piercing the fuck out of my body and stretching my earlobes to a very large gauge, past the "point of no return" where I'll require surgery to ever look the same again.
So it uses fairly outdated kernel, and a version of wine so old it's completely unsupported? Does it still require 32-bit kernel as well (like it did in previous versions)? Oh, apparently it does. Why is this useful or interesting again? Particularly when they don't use a source control repository, and don't allow contribution? Even the 'test' only compares latency of access to base file and registry functions. That says nothing of throughput, or actual performance. (Nevermind that small files would almost certainly be cached when accessed repeatedly since they don't detail disabling that.) This has extraordinarily little relevance as far as general wine usage, or normal wine performance.
This is one of those things that can only be learned through lots and lots of practice.  When you're playing, get in the habit of asking yourself every few seconds "what else am i supposed to be paying attention to?"  Check the minimap, check your upgrade status, make sure you're producing workers, etc...  If you don't specifically focus on trying to split your attention, you will never get better at it.  Doing this in a live match can be overwhelming when you're new, so you could try practicing against the AI.  It doesn't really fight back, so you won't be under pressure.  My first day with the game I practiced a build order until I had it down, and then moved on to practicing my micro+macro.  I'd make some roaches and hydras, then just move them around the map and keeping them in good position (i.e. roaches in front to tank my imaginary foe) while simultaneously macroing more hydras/roaches.  After a few hours of practice I was able to do it fairly well.  It is obviously much harder to do when playing against a real opponent but there is no shortcut solution: you just have to play a lot of games and deliberately practice in each one.
there's a difference between the IDF who are responsible for [child abuses](http://english.aljazeera.net/news/middleeast/2010/05/201053082239109343.html) and [murdering unarmed civilians](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Rachel_Corrie) and [kidnapping people](http://www.eecho.ie/news/index.aspx?c=ireland&amp;jp=eyojsnidqlau) in international waters and jews being put through the holocaust.
Yeah, Indians have it really great.  I take it you've never been to an indian reservation?
